Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE D. EDUCATORS AND SCHOOL DISTRICT EMPLOYEES AND VOLUNTEERS

CHAPTER 21. EDUCATORS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 21.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commissioner" includes a person designated by the commissioner.

(2) "Digital learning" means any type of learning that is facilitated by technology or instructional practice that makes effective use of technology.

(3) "Digital literacy" means having the knowledge and ability to use a range of technology tools for varied purposes. The term includes the capacity to use, understand, and evaluate technology for use in education settings.

(3-a) "Student with a disability" means a student who is:

(A) eligible to participate in a school district's special education program under Section 29.003;

(B) covered by Section 504, Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794); or

(C) covered by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et seq.).

(4) "Virtual instruction" means instructional activities delivered to students primarily over the Internet.

(5) "Virtual learning" means digital learning facilitated by virtual instruction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 548 (S.B. 226), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(10), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 21.002. TEACHER EMPLOYMENT CONTRACTS. (a) A school district shall employ each classroom teacher, principal, librarian, nurse, or school counselor under:

(1) a probationary contract, as provided by Subchapter C;

(2) a continuing contract, as provided by Subchapter D; or

(3) a term contract, as provided by Subchapter E.

(b) A district is not required to employ a person other than an employee listed in Subsection (a) under a probationary, continuing, or term contract.

(c) Each board of trustees shall establish a policy designating specific positions of employment, or categories of positions based on considerations such as length of service, to which continuing contracts or term contracts apply.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.003. CERTIFICATION REQUIRED. (a) A person may not be employed as a teacher, teacher intern or teacher trainee, librarian, educational aide, administrator, educational diagnostician, or school counselor by a school district unless the person holds an appropriate certificate or permit issued as provided by Subchapter B.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, a person may not be employed by a school district as an audiologist, occupational therapist, physical therapist, physician, nurse, school psychologist, associate school psychologist, licensed professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, social worker, or speech language pathologist unless the person is licensed by the state agency that licenses that profession and may perform specific services within those professions for a school district only if the person holds the appropriate credential from the appropriate state agency. As long as a person employed by a district before September 1, 2011, to perform marriage and family therapy, as defined by Section 502.002, Occupations Code, is employed by the same district, the person is not required to hold a license as a marriage and family therapist to perform marriage and family therapy with that district.

(c) The commissioner may waive the requirement for certification of a superintendent if requested by a school district as provided by Section 7.056. A person who is not certified as a superintendent may not be employed by a school district as the superintendent before the person has received a waiver of certification from the commissioner. The commissioner may limit the waiver of certification in any manner the commissioner determines is appropriate. A person may be designated to act as a temporary or interim superintendent for a school district, but the district may not employ the person under a contract as superintendent unless the person has been certified or a waiver has been granted.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 158), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1134 (H.B. 1386), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (S.B. 168), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 21.0031. FAILURE TO OBTAIN CERTIFICATION; CONTRACT VOID. (a) An employee's probationary, continuing, or term contract under this chapter is void if the employee:

(1) does not hold a valid certificate or permit issued by the State Board for Educator Certification;

(2) fails to fulfill the requirements necessary to renew or extend the employee's temporary, probationary, or emergency certificate or any other certificate or permit issued under Subchapter B; or

(3) fails to comply with any requirement under Subchapter C, Chapter 22, if the failure results in suspension or revocation of the employee's certificate under Section 22.0831(f)(2).

(b) If a school district has knowledge that an employee's contract is void under Subsection (a):

(1) the district may, except as provided by Subsection (b-1):

(A) terminate the employee;

(B) suspend the employee with or without pay; or

(C) retain the employee for the remainder of the school year on an at-will employment basis in a position other than a position required to be held by an employee under a contract under Section 21.002 at the employee's existing rate of pay or at a reduced rate; and

(2) the employee is not entitled to the minimum salary prescribed by Section 21.402.

(b-1) A school district may not terminate or suspend under Subsection (b) an employee whose contract is void under Subsection (a)(1) or (2) because the employee failed to renew or extend the employee's certificate or permit if the employee:

(1) requests an extension from the State Board for Educator Certification to renew, extend, or otherwise validate the employee's certificate or permit; and

(2) not later than the 10th day after the date the contract is void, takes necessary measures to renew, extend, or otherwise validate the employee's certificate or permit, as determined by the State Board for Educator Certification.

(c) A school district's decision under Subsection (b) is not subject to appeal under this chapter, and the notice and hearing requirements of this chapter do not apply to the decision.

(d) This section does not affect the rights and remedies of a party in an at-will employment relationship.

(e) This section does not apply to a certified teacher assigned to teach a subject for which the teacher is not certified.

(f) For purposes of this section, a certificate or permit is not considered to have expired if:

(1) the employee has completed the requirements for renewal of the certificate or permit;

(2) the employee submitted the request for renewal prior to the expiration date; and

(3) the date the certificate or permit would have expired is before the date the State Board for Educator Certification takes action to approve the renewal of the certificate or permit.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 181, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (H.B. 1334), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.004. TEACHER RECRUITMENT PROGRAM. (a) To the extent that funds are available, the agency, the State Board for Educator Certification, and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall develop and implement programs to identify talented students and recruit those students and persons, including high school and undergraduate students, mid-career and retired professionals, honorably discharged and retired military personnel, and members of underrepresented gender and ethnic groups, into the teaching profession.

(b) From available funds, the agency, the State Board for Educator Certification, and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall develop and distribute materials that emphasize the importance of the teaching profession and inform individuals about state-funded loan forgiveness and tuition assistance programs.

(c) The commissioner, in cooperation with the commissioner of higher education and the executive director of the State Board for Educator Certification, shall annually identify the need for teachers in specific subject areas and geographic regions and among underrepresented groups. The commissioner shall give priority to developing and implementing recruitment programs to address those needs from the agency's discretionary funds.

(d) The agency, the State Board for Educator Certification, and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall encourage the business community to cooperate with local schools to develop recruiting programs designed to attract and retain capable teachers, including programs to provide summer employment opportunities for teachers.

(e) The agency, the State Board for Educator Certification, and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall encourage major education associations to cooperate in developing a long-range program promoting teaching as a career and to assist in identifying local activities and resources that may be used to promote the teaching profession.

(f) Funds received for teacher recruitment programs may be used only to publicize and implement the programs.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1590, Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 1999.

Sec. 21.006. REQUIREMENT TO REPORT MISCONDUCT. (a) In this section:

(1) "Abuse" has the meaning assigned by Section 261.001, Family Code, and includes any sexual conduct involving an educator and a student or minor.

(2) "Other charter entity" means:

(A) a school district operating under a home-rule school district charter adopted under Subchapter B, Chapter 12;

(B) a campus or campus program operating under a charter granted under Subchapter C, Chapter 12; and

(C) an entity that contracts to partner with a school district under Section 11.174(a)(2) to operate a district campus under a charter granted to the entity by the district under Subchapter C, Chapter 12.

(b) In addition to the reporting requirement under Section 261.101, Family Code, and except as provided by Subsection (c-2), the superintendent or director of a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, other charter entity, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement shall notify the State Board for Educator Certification if:

(1) an educator employed by or seeking employment by the school district, district of innovation, charter school, other charter entity, service center, or shared services arrangement has a criminal record and the school district, district of innovation, charter school, other charter entity, service center, or shared services arrangement obtained information about the educator's criminal record by a means other than the criminal history clearinghouse established under Section 411.0845, Government Code;

(2) an educator's employment at the school district, district of innovation, charter school, other charter entity, service center, or shared services arrangement was terminated and there is evidence that the educator:

(A) abused or otherwise committed an unlawful act with a student or minor;

(A-1) was involved in a romantic relationship with or solicited or engaged in sexual contact with a student or minor;

(B) possessed, transferred, sold, or distributed a controlled substance, as defined by Chapter 481, Health and Safety Code, or by 21 U.S.C. Section 801 et seq.;

(C) illegally transferred, appropriated, or expended funds or other property of the school district, district of innovation, charter school, other charter entity, service center, or shared services arrangement;

(D) attempted by fraudulent or unauthorized means to obtain or alter a professional certificate or license for the purpose of promotion or additional compensation; or

(E) committed a criminal offense or any part of a criminal offense on school property or at a school-sponsored event;

(3) the educator resigned and there is evidence that the educator engaged in misconduct described by Subdivision (2); or

(4) the educator engaged in conduct that violated the assessment instrument security procedures established under Section 39.0301.

(b-1) A superintendent or director of a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, other charter entity, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement shall complete an investigation of an educator that involves evidence that the educator may have engaged in misconduct described by Subsection (b)(2)(A) or (A-1), despite the educator's resignation from employment before completion of the investigation.

(b-2) The principal of a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, or other charter entity campus must notify the superintendent or director of the school district, district of innovation, charter school, or other charter entity not later than the seventh business day after the date:

(1) of an educator's termination of employment or resignation following an alleged incident of misconduct described by Subsection (b); or

(2) the principal knew about an educator's criminal record under Subsection (b)(1).

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (c-2), the superintendent or director must notify the State Board for Educator Certification by filing a report with the board not later than the seventh business day after the date the superintendent or director receives a report from a principal under Subsection (b-2) or knew about an educator's termination of employment or resignation following an alleged incident of misconduct described by Subsection (b) or an employee's criminal record under Subsection (b)(1).

(c-1) The report under Subsection (c):

(1) must be:

(A) in writing; and

(B) in a form prescribed by the board; and

(2) may be filed through the Internet portal developed and maintained by the State Board for Educator Certification under Subsection (g-1).

(c-2) A superintendent or director of a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement is not required to notify the State Board for Educator Certification or file a report with the board under Subsection (b) or (c) if the superintendent or director:

(1) completes an investigation into an educator's alleged incident of misconduct described by Subsection (b)(2)(A) or (A-1) before the educator's termination of employment or resignation; and

(2) determines the educator did not engage in the alleged incident of misconduct described by Subsection (b)(2)(A) or (A-1).

(d) The superintendent or director shall notify the board of trustees or governing body of the school district, open-enrollment charter school, other charter entity, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement and the educator of the filing of the report required by Subsection (c).

(e) A superintendent, director, or principal of a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, other charter entity, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement who in good faith and while acting in an official capacity files a report with the State Board for Educator Certification under this section or communicates with another superintendent, director, or principal concerning an educator's criminal record or alleged incident of misconduct is immune from civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

(f) The State Board for Educator Certification shall determine whether to impose sanctions, including an administrative penalty under Subsection (i), against a principal who fails to provide notification to a superintendent or director in violation of Subsection (b-2) or against a superintendent or director who fails to file a report in violation of Subsection (c).

(g) The State Board for Educator Certification shall propose rules as necessary to implement this section.

(g-1) The State Board for Educator Certification shall develop and maintain an Internet portal through which a report required under Subsection (c) may be confidentially and securely filed.

(h) The name of a student or minor who is the victim of abuse or unlawful conduct by an educator must be included in a report filed under this section, but the name of the student or minor is not public information under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(i) If an educator serving as a superintendent or director is required to file a report under Subsection (c) and fails to file the report by the date required by that subsection, or if an educator serving as a principal is required to notify a superintendent or director about an educator's criminal record or alleged incident of misconduct under Subsection (b-2) and fails to provide the notice by the date required by that subsection, the State Board for Educator Certification may impose on the educator an administrative penalty of not less than $500 and not more than $10,000. The State Board for Educator Certification may not renew the certification of an educator against whom an administrative penalty is imposed under this subsection until the penalty is paid.

(j) A superintendent or director required to file a report under Subsection (c) commits an offense if the superintendent or director fails to file the report by the date required by that subsection with intent to conceal an educator's criminal record or alleged incident of misconduct. A principal required to notify a superintendent or director about an educator's criminal record or alleged incident of misconduct under Subsection (b-2) commits an offense if the principal fails to provide the notice by the date required by that subsection with intent to conceal an educator's criminal record or alleged incident of misconduct. An offense under this subsection is a state jail felony.

(k) The commissioner may review the records of a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, other charter entity, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement to ensure compliance with the requirement to report misconduct under this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 374, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 511 (S.B. 606), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 1031), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 761 (H.B. 1610), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1043 (H.B. 1783), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2A.010, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1476), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 21.0061. NOTICE TO PARENT OR GUARDIAN ABOUT EDUCATOR MISCONDUCT. (a) The board of trustees or governing body of a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, other charter entity, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement shall adopt a policy under which notice is provided to the parent or guardian of a student with whom an educator is alleged to have engaged in misconduct described by Section 21.006(b)(2)(A) or (A-1) informing the parent or guardian:

(1) that the alleged misconduct occurred;

(2) whether the educator was terminated following an investigation of the alleged misconduct or resigned before completion of the investigation; and

(3) whether a report was submitted to the State Board for Educator Certification concerning the alleged misconduct.

(b) The policy required by this section must require that information specified by Subsection (a)(1) be provided as soon as feasible after the employing entity becomes aware that alleged misconduct may have occurred.

(c) In this section, "other charter entity" has the meaning assigned by Section 21.006.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2A.011, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.0062. REQUIREMENT TO REPORT MISCONDUCT: PRIVATE SCHOOLS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Abuse" has the meaning assigned by Section 261.001, Family Code, and includes any sexual conduct involving a student or minor and private school educator.

(2) "Private school educator" means a person employed by or seeking employment in a private school for a position in which the person would be required to hold a certificate issued under Subchapter B if the person were employed by a school district.

(b) In addition to the reporting requirement under Section 261.101, Family Code, the chief administrative officer of a private school shall notify the State Board for Educator Certification if a private school educator:

(1) has a criminal record and the private school obtained information about the educator's criminal record; or

(2) was terminated and there is evidence that the educator:

(A) abused or otherwise committed an unlawful act with a student or minor; or

(B) was involved in a romantic relationship with or solicited or engaged in sexual contact with a student or minor.

(c) If there is evidence that a private school educator may have engaged in misconduct described by Subsection (b) and the educator resigns from employment before completion of the investigation, the chief administrative officer of the private school shall submit the evidence of misconduct collected to the State Board for Educator Certification.

(d) The chief administrative officer of the private school must notify the State Board for Educator Certification by filing a report with the board not later than the seventh business day after the date the chief administrative officer knew that a private school educator:

(1) has a criminal record under Subsection (b)(1); or

(2) was terminated following an alleged incident of misconduct described by Subsection (b)(2).

(e) The report filed under Subsection (d) must be:

(1) in writing; and

(2) in a form prescribed by the board.

(f) Any person who knows or has reason to believe that a private school educator engaged in the misconduct described by Subsection (b)(2) may file a report with the State Board for Educator Certification under this section.

(g) A chief administrative officer of a private school or any other person who in good faith files a report with the State Board for Educator Certification under this section or communicates with a chief administrative officer or other administrator of a private school concerning the criminal record of or an alleged incident of misconduct by a private school educator is immune from civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

(h) The name of a student or minor who is the victim of abuse or unlawful conduct by a private school educator must be included in a report filed under this section, but the name of the student or minor is not public information under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(i) The State Board for Educator Certification shall propose rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 986 (S.B. 1230), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.007. NOTICE ON CERTIFICATION RECORD OF ALLEGED MISCONDUCT. (a) In this section, "board" means the State Board for Educator Certification.

(b) The board shall adopt a procedure for placing a notice of alleged misconduct on an educator's public certification records. The procedure adopted by the board must provide for immediate placement of a notice of alleged misconduct on an educator's public certification records if the alleged misconduct presents a risk to the health, safety, or welfare of a student or minor as determined by the board.

(c) The board must notify an educator in writing when placing a notice of an alleged incident of misconduct on the public certification records of the educator.

(d) The board must provide an opportunity for an educator to show cause why the notice should not be placed on the educator's public certification records. The board shall propose rules establishing the length of time that a notice may remain on the educator's public certification records before the board must:

(1) initiate a proceeding to impose a sanction on the educator on the basis of the alleged misconduct; or

(2) remove the notice from the educator's public certification records.

(e) If it is determined that the educator has not engaged in the alleged incident of misconduct, the board shall immediately remove the notice from the educator's public certification records.

(f) The board shall propose rules necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1372 (S.B. 9), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 21.009. PRE-EMPLOYMENT AFFIDAVIT. (a) An applicant for a position described by Section 21.003(a) or (b) with a school district, district of innovation, open-enrollment charter school, private school, regional education service center, or shared services arrangement must submit, using a form adopted by the agency, a pre-employment affidavit disclosing whether the applicant has ever been charged with, adjudicated for, or convicted of having an inappropriate relationship with a minor.

(b) An applicant who answers affirmatively concerning an inappropriate relationship with a minor must disclose in the affidavit all relevant facts pertaining to the charge, adjudication, or conviction, including, for a charge, whether the charge was determined to be true or false.

(c) An applicant is not precluded from being employed based on a disclosed charge if the employing entity determines based on the information disclosed in the affidavit that the charge was false.

(d) A determination that an employee failed to disclose information required to be disclosed by an applicant under this section is grounds for termination of employment.

(e) The State Board for Educator Certification may revoke the certificate of an administrator if the board determines it is reasonable to believe that the administrator employed an applicant for a position described by Section 21.003(a) or (b) despite being aware that the applicant had been adjudicated for or convicted of having an inappropriate relationship with a minor.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 986 (S.B. 1230), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. CERTIFICATION OF EDUCATORS

Sec. 21.031. PURPOSE. (a) The State Board for Educator Certification is established to recognize public school educators as professionals and to grant educators the authority to govern the standards of their profession. The board shall regulate and oversee all aspects of the certification, continuing education, and standards of conduct of public school educators.

(b) In proposing rules under this subchapter, the board shall ensure that all candidates for certification or renewal of certification demonstrate the knowledge and skills necessary to improve the performance of the diverse student population of this state.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.032. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "board" means the State Board for Educator Certification.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.033. STATE BOARD FOR EDUCATOR CERTIFICATION. (a) The State Board for Educator Certification is composed of 15 members. The commissioner of education shall appoint an employee of the agency to represent the commissioner as a nonvoting member. The commissioner of higher education shall appoint an employee of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board to represent the commissioner as a nonvoting member. The governor shall appoint two nonvoting members. The governor shall appoint a dean of a college of education in this state as one of the nonvoting members. The governor shall appoint a person who has experience working for and knowledge of an alternative educator preparation program and who is not affiliated with an institution of higher education as one of the nonvoting members. The remaining 11 members are appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, as follows:

(1) four members must be teachers employed in public schools;

(2) two members must be public school administrators;

(3) one member must be a public school counselor; and

(4) four members must be citizens, three of whom are not and have not, in the five years preceding appointment, been employed by a public school district or by an educator preparation program in an institution of higher education and one of whom is not and has not been employed by a public school district or by an educator preparation program in an institution of higher education.

(a-1) At least two of the members appointed under Subsection (a)(1), (2), or (3) must be from a school district eligible for an allotment under Section 48.101.

(b) Appointments to the board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the person appointed.

(c) A board member is immune from civil suit for any act performed in good faith in the execution of duties as a board member.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1174, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1030 (H.B. 2519), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.034. TERMS; VACANCY. (a) The board members appointed by the governor hold office for staggered terms of six years with the terms of one-third of the members expiring on February 1 of each odd-numbered year. A member appointed by the commissioner of education or the commissioner of higher education serves at the will of the appointing commissioner.

(b) In the event of a vacancy during a term of a member appointed by the governor, the governor shall appoint a replacement who meets the qualifications of the vacated office to fill the unexpired portion of the term.

(c) A vacancy arises if a member appointed by the governor no longer qualifies for the office to which the member was appointed.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.035. DELEGATION AUTHORITY; ADMINISTRATION BY AGENCY. (a) The board is permitted to make a written delegation of authority to the commissioner or the agency to informally dispose of a contested case involving educator certification.

(b) The agency shall provide the board's administrative functions and services.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1112, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1227 (H.B. 1116), Sec. 1.04, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.036. OFFICERS. The board shall elect one of its members to serve as presiding officer for a term of two years. The presiding officer is entitled to vote on all matters before the board. The board may elect other officers from among its membership.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1174, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 21.037. COMPENSATION. A board member may not receive compensation for serving on the board. A member is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing functions as a member of the board, subject to any applicable limitation on reimbursement provided by the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.038. MEETINGS. (a) The board shall meet at least once in each quarter of the calendar year.

(b) The board may meet at other times at the call of the presiding officer or as provided by the rules of the board.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.040. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD. The board shall:

(1) appoint the members of any advisory committee to the board;

(2) for each class of educator certificate, appoint an advisory committee composed of members of that class to recommend standards for that class to the board;

(3) provide to its members and employees, as often as necessary, information regarding their qualifications for office or employment under this chapter and their responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees; and

(4) develop and implement policies that clearly define the respective responsibilities of the board and the board's staff.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 439 (S.B. 1376), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 4, 2019.

Sec. 21.041. RULES; FEES. (a) The board may adopt rules as necessary for its own procedures.

(b) The board shall propose rules that:

(1) provide for the regulation of educators and the general administration of this subchapter in a manner consistent with this subchapter;

(2) specify the classes of educator certificates to be issued, including emergency certificates;

(3) specify the period for which each class of educator certificate is valid;

(4) specify the requirements for the issuance and renewal of an educator certificate;

(5) provide for the issuance of an educator certificate to a person who holds a similar certificate issued by another state or foreign country, subject to Section 21.052;

(6) provide for special or restricted certification of educators, including certification of instructors of American Sign Language;

(7) provide for disciplinary proceedings, including the suspension or revocation of an educator certificate, as provided by Chapter 2001, Government Code;

(8) provide for the adoption, amendment, and enforcement of an educator's code of ethics;

(9) provide for continuing education requirements; and

(10) provide for certification of persons performing appraisals under Subchapter H.

(c) The board shall propose a rule adopting a fee for the issuance and maintenance of an educator certificate that, when combined with any fees imposed under Subsection (d), is adequate to cover the cost of administration of this subchapter.

(d) The board may propose a rule adopting a fee for the approval or renewal of approval of an educator preparation program, or for the addition of a certificate or field of certification to the scope of a program's approval. A fee imposed under this subsection may not exceed the amount necessary, as determined by the board, to provide for the administrative cost of approving, renewing the approval of, and appropriately ensuring the accountability of educator preparation programs under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 21.042. APPROVAL OF RULES. The State Board for Educator Certification must submit a written copy of each rule it proposes to adopt to the State Board of Education for review. The State Board of Education may reject a proposed rule by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the board present and voting. If the State Board of Education fails to reject a proposal before the 90th day after the date on which it receives the proposal, the proposal takes effect as a rule of the State Board for Educator Certification as provided by Chapter 2001, Government Code. The State Board of Education may not modify a rule proposed by the State Board for Educator Certification.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.043. ACCESS TO PEIMS DATA. (a) The agency shall provide the board with access to data obtained under the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS).

(b) The agency shall provide educator preparation programs with data based on information reported through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) that enables an educator preparation program to:

(1) assess the impact of the program; and

(2) revise the program as needed to improve the design and effectiveness of the program.

(c) The agency in coordination with the board shall solicit input from educator preparation programs to determine the data to be provided to educator preparation programs.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 21.044. EDUCATOR PREPARATION. (a) The board shall propose rules:

(1) specifying what each educator is expected to know and be able to do, particularly with regard to students with disabilities;

(2) establishing the training requirements a person must accomplish to obtain a certificate, enter an internship, or enter an induction-year program; and

(3) specifying the minimum academic qualifications required for a certificate.

(a-1) Any training requirements for a certificate specified under Subsection (a) must require that the person demonstrate:

(1) basic knowledge of:

(A) each disability category under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et seq.) and how each category can affect student learning and development; and

(B) conditions that may be considered a disability under Section 504, Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794), and how a condition covered by that section can affect student learning and development;

(2) competence in the use of proactive instructional planning techniques that:

(A) provide flexibility in the ways:

(i) information is presented;

(ii) students respond or demonstrate knowledge and skills; and

(iii) students are engaged;

(B) reduce barriers in instruction;

(C) provide appropriate accommodations, supports, and challenges; and

(D) maintain high achievement expectations for all students, including students with disabilities and students of limited English proficiency;

(3) competence in the use of evidence-based inclusive instructional practices, including:

(A) general and special education collaborative and co-teaching models and approaches;

(B) multitiered systems of support, including response to intervention strategies, classroom and school level data-based collaborative structures, and evidence-based strategies for intervention and progress monitoring systems in academic areas;

(C) classroom management techniques using evidence-based behavioral intervention strategies and supports; and

(D) appropriate adaptation strategies, including accommodations, modifications, and instruction in the use of assistive technology for instruction; and

(4) thorough understanding of and competence in the use of open education resource instructional materials included on the list of approved instructional materials maintained by the State Board of Education under Section 31.022 in each subject area and grade level covered by the person's certificate.

(b) The minimum academic qualifications for a certificate specified under Subsection (a) must require that the person receive, as part of the training required to obtain that certificate, instruction in detection and education of students with dyslexia.

(c) The instruction under Subsection (b) must:

(1) be developed by a panel of experts in the diagnosis and treatment of dyslexia who are:

(A) employed by institutions of higher education; and

(B) approved by the board; and

(2) include information on:

(A) characteristics of dyslexia;

(B) identification of dyslexia; and

(C) effective, multisensory strategies for teaching students with dyslexia.

(c-1) The minimum academic qualifications for a certificate specified under Subsection (a) must require that the person receive, as part of the training required to obtain that certificate, instruction regarding mental health, substance abuse, and youth suicide. The instruction required must:

(1) be provided through:

(A) a program selected from the list of recommended best practice-based programs and research-based practices established under Section 38.351; or

(B) a course offered by any accredited public or private postsecondary educational institution as part of a degree program; and

(2) include effective strategies, including de-escalation techniques and positive behavioral interventions and supports, for teaching and intervening with students with mental health conditions or who engage in substance abuse.

(c-2) Any minimum academic qualifications for a certificate specified under Subsection (a) that require a person to possess a bachelor's degree must also require that the person receive, as part of the training required to obtain that certificate, instruction in digital learning, virtual learning, and virtual instruction, including a digital literacy evaluation followed by a prescribed digital learning curriculum. The instruction required must:

(1) be aligned with the International Society for Technology in Education's standards for teachers;

(2) provide effective, evidence-based strategies to determine a person's degree of digital literacy;

(3) cover best practices in:

(A) assessing students receiving virtual instruction, based on academic progress; and

(B) developing a virtual learning curriculum; and

(4) include resources to address any deficiencies identified by the digital literacy evaluation.

(d) In proposing rules under this section, the board shall specify that to obtain a certificate to teach an "applied STEM course," as that term is defined by Section 28.027, at a secondary school, a person must:

(1) pass the certification test administered by the recognized national or international business and industry group that created the curriculum the applied STEM course is based on; and

(2) have at a minimum:

(A) an associate degree from an accredited institution of higher education; and

(B) three years of work experience in an occupation for which the applied STEM course is intended to prepare the student.

(e) In proposing rules under this section for a person to obtain a certificate to teach a health science technology education course, the board shall specify that a person must have:

(1) an associate degree or more advanced degree from an accredited institution of higher education;

(2) current licensure, certification, or registration as a health professions practitioner issued by a nationally recognized accrediting agency for health professionals; and

(3) at least two years of wage earning experience utilizing the licensure requirement.

(f) The board may not propose rules for a certificate to teach a health science technology education course that specify that a person must have a bachelor's degree or that establish any other credential or teaching experience requirements that exceed the requirements under Subsection (e).

(f-1) Board rules addressing ongoing educator preparation program support for a candidate seeking certification in a certification class other than classroom teacher may not require that an educator preparation program conduct one or more formal observations of the candidate on the candidate's site in a face-to-face setting. The rules must permit each required formal observation to occur on the candidate's site or through use of electronic transmission or other video-based or technology-based method.

(g) Each educator preparation program must provide information regarding:

(1) the skills that educators are required to possess, the responsibilities that educators are required to accept, and the high expectations for all students, including students with disabilities, in this state;

(2) the effect of supply and demand forces on the educator workforce in this state;

(3) the performance over time of the educator preparation program;

(4) the importance of building strong classroom management skills;

(5) the framework in this state for teacher and principal evaluation, including the procedures followed in accordance with Subchapter H; and

(6) appropriate relationships, boundaries, and communications between educators and students.

(h) An educator preparation program may not include instruction on the use of instructional materials that incorporate the method of three-cueing, as defined by Section 28.0062(a-1), into foundational skills reading instruction.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (S.B. 866), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 926 (S.B. 1620), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 4.001, eff. September 1, 2013.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1091 (H.B. 3573), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1282 (H.B. 2012), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1321 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1157 (S.B. 674), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1157 (S.B. 674), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(8), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 714 (H.B. 4056), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 3, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 1963), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.03, eff. December 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 548 (S.B. 226), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 1605), Sec. 2, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 21.0441. ADMISSION REQUIREMENTS FOR EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS. (a) Rules of the board proposed under this subchapter must provide that a person, other than a person seeking career and technology education certification, is not eligible for admission to an educator preparation program, including an alternative educator preparation program, unless the person:

(1) except as provided by Subsection (b), satisfies the following minimum grade point average requirements:

(A) an overall grade point average of at least 2.50 on a four-point scale or the equivalent on any course work previously attempted at a public or private institution of higher education; or

(B) a grade point average of at least 2.50 on a four-point scale or the equivalent for the last 60 semester credit hours attempted at a public or private institution of higher education; and

(2) if the person is seeking initial certification:

(A) has successfully completed at least:

(i) 15 semester credit hours in the subject-specific content area in which the person is seeking certification, if the person is seeking certification to teach mathematics or science at or above grade level seven; or

(ii) 12 semester credit hours in the subject-specific content area in which the person is seeking certification, if the person is not seeking certification to teach mathematics or science at or above grade level seven; or

(B) has achieved a satisfactory level of performance on a content certification examination, which may be a content certification examination administered by a vendor approved by the commissioner for purposes of administering such an examination for the year for which the person is applying for admission to the program.

(b) The board's rules must permit an educator preparation program to admit in extraordinary circumstances a person who fails to satisfy a grade point average requirement prescribed by Subsection (a)(1)(A) or (B), provided that:

(1) not more than 10 percent of the total number of persons admitted to the program in a year fail to satisfy the requirement under Subsection (a)(1)(A) or (B);

(2) each person admitted as described by this subsection performs, before admission, at a satisfactory level on an appropriate subject matter examination for each subject in which the person seeks certification; and

(3) for each person admitted as described by this subsection, the director of the program determines and certifies, based on documentation provided by the person, that the person's work, business, or career experience demonstrates achievement comparable to the academic achievement represented by the grade point average requirement.

(c) The overall grade point average of each incoming class admitted by an educator preparation program, including an alternative educator preparation program, may not be less than 3.00 on a four-point scale or the equivalent or a higher overall grade point average prescribed by the board. In computing the overall grade point average of an incoming class for purposes of this subsection, a program may:

(1) include the grade point average of each person in the incoming class based on all course work previously attempted by the person at a public or private institution of higher education; or

(2) include the grade point average of each person in the incoming class based only on the last 60 semester credit hours attempted by the person at a public or private institution of higher education.

(d) A person seeking career and technology education certification is not included in determining the overall grade point average of an incoming class under Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1282 (H.B. 2012), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 526 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

See note following this section.

Sec. 21.0442. EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAM FOR PROBATIONARY AND STANDARD TRADE AND INDUSTRIAL WORKFORCE TRAINING CERTIFICATES. (a) The board shall propose rules under this subchapter to create an abbreviated educator preparation program for a person seeking certification in trade and industrial workforce training.

(b) A person is eligible for admission to an educator preparation program created under this section only if the person:

(1) has been issued a high school diploma or a postsecondary credential, certificate, or degree;

(2) has seven years of full-time wage-earning experience within the preceding 10 years in an approved occupation for which instruction is offered;

(3) holds with respect to that occupation a current license, certificate, or registration, as applicable, issued by a nationally recognized accrediting agency based on a recognized test or measurement; and

(4) within the period described by Subdivision (2), has not been the subject of a complaint filed with a licensing entity or other agency that regulates the occupation of the person, other than a complaint that was determined baseless or unfounded by that entity or agency.

(c) In proposing rules for an educator preparation program under this section, the board shall ensure that the program requires at least 80 hours of classroom instruction in:

(1) a specific pedagogy;

(2) creating lesson plans;

(3) creating student assessment instruments;

(4) classroom management; and

(5) relevant federal and state education laws.

Text of section effective on June 15, 2017, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1077 (H.B. 3349), Sec. 3, which states: This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 85th Legislature.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1077 (H.B. 3349), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 21.0443. EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAM APPROVAL AND RENEWAL. (a) The board shall propose rules to establish standards to govern the approval or renewal of approval of:

(1) educator preparation programs; and

(2) certification fields authorized to be offered by an educator preparation program.

(b) To be eligible for approval or renewal of approval, an educator preparation program must:

(1) incorporate proactive instructional planning techniques throughout course work and across content areas using a framework that:

(A) provides flexibility in the ways:

(i) information is presented;

(ii) students respond or demonstrate knowledge and skills; and

(iii) students are engaged;

(B) reduces barriers in instruction;

(C) provides appropriate accommodations, supports, and challenges; and

(D) maintains high achievement expectations for all students, including students with disabilities and students of limited English proficiency;

(2) integrate inclusive practices for all students, including students with disabilities, and evidence-based instruction and intervention strategies throughout course work, clinical experience, and student teaching;

(3) adequately prepare candidates for educator certification; and

(4) meet the standards and requirements of the board.

(c) The board shall require that each educator preparation program be reviewed for renewal of approval at least every five years. The board shall adopt an evaluation process to be used in reviewing an educator preparation program for renewal of approval.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.0444. TEMPORARY CERTIFICATION FOR CERTAIN MILITARY SERVICE MEMBERS AND FIRST RESPONDERS. (a) In this section, "first responder" means a person elected, employed, or appointed as:

(1) a peace officer as defined by Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(2) fire protection personnel as defined by Section 419.021, Government Code; or

(3) emergency medical services personnel as defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code.

(b) This section applies to a person seeking certification to teach career and technology education who:

(1) has served in the armed forces of the United States and was honorably discharged, retired, or released from active duty; or

(2) has served as a first responder and, while in good standing and not because of pending or final disciplinary actions or a documented performance problem, retired, resigned, or separated from employment as a first responder.

(c) The board shall propose rules under this subchapter providing for the issuance of a temporary certificate to teach career and technology education to a person described by Subsection (b) who meets all other eligibility requirements for standard certification to teach career and technology education, except that the person may substitute for a requirement that the person hold:

(1) an associate degree from an accredited institution of higher education, 48 months of active duty military service or service as a first responder; or

(2) a bachelor's degree:

(A) the military service or service as a first responder described by Subdivision (1); and

(B) 60 semester credit hours completed at a public or private institution of higher education with a minimum grade point average of at least 2.50 on a four-point scale.

(d) Rules proposed by the board for a temporary certificate issued under this section must provide that the certificate is:

(1) valid for no more than three years;

(2) limited to a one-time issuance; and

(3) not subject to renewal.

(e) A person issued a temporary certificate under this section may be issued a standard certificate if the person completes all eligibility requirements required for that certification.

(f) A school district shall require a new employee who holds a temporary certificate issued under this section to obtain at least 20 hours of classroom management training, unless the new employee has documented experience as an instructor or trainer during the employee's required 48 months of active duty military service or service as a first responder.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 806 (H.B. 621), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 21.045. ACCOUNTABILITY SYSTEM FOR EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS. (a) The board shall propose rules necessary to establish standards to govern the continuing accountability of all educator preparation programs based on the following information that is disaggregated with respect to race, sex, and ethnicity:

(1) results of the certification examinations prescribed under Section 21.048(a);

(2) performance based on the appraisal system for beginning teachers adopted by the board;

(3) achievement, including improvement in achievement, of all students, including students with disabilities, taught by beginning teachers for the first three years following certification, to the extent practicable;

(4) compliance with board requirements regarding the frequency, duration, and quality of structural guidance and ongoing support provided by field supervisors to candidates completing student teaching, clinical teaching, or an internship; and

(5) results from a teacher satisfaction survey, developed by the board with stakeholder input, of new teachers performed at the end of the teacher's first year of teaching.

(b) Each educator preparation program shall submit data elements as required by the board for an annual performance report to ensure access and equity. At a minimum, the annual report must contain:

(1) the performance data from Subsection (a), other than the data required for purposes of Subsection (a)(3);

(2) data related to the program's compliance with requirements for field supervision of candidates during their clinical teaching and internship experiences;

(3) the following information, disaggregated by race, sex, and ethnicity:

(A) the number of candidates who apply;

(B) the number of candidates admitted;

(C) the number of candidates retained;

(D) the number of candidates completing the program;

(E) the number of candidates employed as beginning teachers under standard teaching certificates by not later than the first anniversary of completing the program;

(F) the amount of time required by candidates employed as beginning teachers under probationary teaching certificates to be issued standard teaching certificates;

(G) the number of candidates retained in the profession; and

(H) any other information required by federal law;

(4) the ratio of field supervisors to candidates completing student teaching, clinical teaching, or an internship; and

(5) any other information necessary to enable the board to assess the effectiveness of the program on the basis of teacher retention and success criteria adopted by the board.

(c) The board shall propose rules necessary to establish performance standards for the Accountability System for Educator Preparation for accrediting educator preparation programs. At a minimum, performance standards must be based on Subsection (a).

(d) To assist an educator preparation program in improving the design and effectiveness of the program in preparing educators for the classroom, the agency shall provide to each program data that is compiled and analyzed by the agency based on information reported through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) relating to the program.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 4, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.0451. SANCTIONS UNDER ACCOUNTABILITY SYSTEM FOR EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS. (a) The board shall propose rules necessary for the sanction of educator preparation programs that do not meet accountability standards or comply with state law or rules and shall at least annually review the accreditation status of each educator preparation program. The rules:

(1) shall provide for the assignment of the following accreditation statuses:

(A) not rated;

(B) accredited;

(C) accredited-warned;

(D) accredited-probation; and

(E) not accredited-revoked;

(2) may provide for the agency to take any necessary action, including one or more of the following actions:

(A) requiring the program to obtain technical assistance approved by the agency or board;

(B) requiring the program to obtain professional services under contract with another person;

(C) appointing a monitor to participate in and report to the board on the activities of the program; and

(D) if a program has been rated as accredited-probation under the Accountability System for Educator Preparation for a period of at least one year, revoking the approval of the program and ordering the program to be closed, provided that the board or agency has provided the opportunity for a contested case hearing;

(3) shall provide for the agency to revoke the approval of the program and order the program to be closed if the program has been rated as accredited-probation under the Accountability System for Educator Preparation for three consecutive years, provided that the board or agency has provided the opportunity for a contested case hearing; and

(4) shall provide the board procedure for changing the accreditation status of a program that:

(A) does not meet the accreditation standards established under Section 21.045(a); or

(B) violates a board or agency regulation.

(b) Any action authorized or required to be taken against an educator preparation program under Subsection (a) may also be taken with regard to a particular field of certification authorized to be offered by an educator preparation program.

(c) A revocation must be effective for a period of at least two years. After two years, the program may seek renewed approval to prepare educators for state certification.

(d) The costs of technical assistance required under Subsection (a)(2)(A) or the costs associated with the appointment of a monitor under Subsection (a)(2)(C) shall be paid by the educator preparation program.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.0452. CONSUMER INFORMATION REGARDING EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS. (a) To assist persons interested in obtaining teaching certification in selecting an educator preparation program and assist school districts in making staffing decisions, the board shall make information regarding educator programs in this state available to the public through the board's Internet website.

(b) The board shall make available at least the following information regarding each educator preparation program:

(1) the information specified in Sections 21.045(a) and (b);

(2) in addition to any other appropriate information indicating the quality of persons admitted to the program, the average academic qualifications possessed by persons admitted to the program, including:

(A) average overall grade point average and average grade point average in specific subject areas; and

(B) average scores on the Scholastic Assessment Test (SAT), the American College Test (ACT), or the Graduate Record Examination (GRE), as applicable;

(3) the degree to which persons who complete the program are successful in obtaining teaching positions;

(4) the extent to which the program prepares teachers, including general education teachers and special education teachers, to effectively teach:

(A) students with disabilities; and

(B) emergent bilingual students, as defined by Section 29.052;

(5) the activities offered by the program that are designed to prepare teachers to:

(A) integrate technology effectively into curricula and instruction, including activities consistent with the principles of universal design for learning; and

(B) use technology effectively to collect, manage, and analyze data to improve teaching and learning for the purpose of increasing student academic achievement;

(6) for each semester, the average ratio of field supervisors to candidates completing student teaching, clinical teaching, or an internship in an educator preparation program;

(7) the perseverance of beginning teachers in the profession, based on information reported through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) providing the number of beginning teachers employed as classroom teachers for at least three years after certification in comparison to similar programs;

(8) the results of exit surveys given to program participants on completion of the program that involve evaluation of the program's effectiveness in preparing participants to succeed in the classroom;

(9) the results of surveys given to school principals that involve evaluation of the program's effectiveness in preparing participants to succeed in the classroom, based on experience with employed program participants; and

(10) the results of teacher satisfaction surveys developed under Section 21.045 and given to program participants at the end of the first year of teaching.

(c) For purposes of Subsection (b)(9), the board shall require an educator preparation program to distribute an exit survey that a program participant must complete before the participant is eligible to receive a certificate under this subchapter.

(d) For purposes of Subsections (b)(9) and (10), the board shall develop surveys for distribution to program participants and school principals.

(e) The board may develop procedures under which each educator preparation program receives a designation or ranking based on the information required to be made available under Subsection (b). If the board develops procedures under this subsection, the designation or ranking received by each program must be included in the information made available under this section.

(f) In addition to other information required to be made available under this section, the board shall provide information identifying employment opportunities for teachers in the various regions of this state. The board shall specifically identify each region of this state in which a shortage of qualified teachers exists.

(g) The board may require any person to provide information to the board for purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 573 (S.B. 241), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 597 (S.B. 668), Sec. 1.02, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2066), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.0453. INFORMATION FOR CANDIDATES FOR TEACHER CERTIFICATION. (a) The board shall require an educator preparation program to provide candidates for teacher certification with information concerning the following:

(1) skills and responsibilities required of teachers with regard to all students, including students with disabilities;

(2) expectations for student performance, including students with disabilities, based on state standards;

(3) the current supply of and demand for teachers in this state;

(4) the importance of developing classroom management skills; and

(5) the state's framework for appraisal of teachers and principals.

(b) The board may propose rules as necessary for administration of this section, including rules to ensure that accurate and consistent information is provided by all educator preparation programs.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1292 (H.B. 2318), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.0454. RISK FACTORS FOR EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS; RISK-ASSESSMENT MODEL. (a) The board shall propose rules necessary to develop a set of risk factors to use in assessing the overall risk level of each educator preparation program. The set of risk factors must include:

(1) a history of the program's compliance with state law and board rules, standards, and procedures, with consideration given to:

(A) the seriousness of any violation of a rule, standard or procedure;

(B) whether the violation resulted in an action being taken against the program;

(C) whether the violation was promptly remedied by the program;

(D) the number of alleged violations; and

(E) any other matter considered to be appropriate in evaluating the program's compliance history; and

(2) whether the program meets the accountability standards under Section 21.045.

(b) The set of risk factors developed by the board may include whether an educator preparation program is accredited by other organizations.

(c) The board shall use the set of risk factors to guide the agency in conducting monitoring, inspections, and compliance audits of educator preparation programs, including evaluations associated with renewals under Section 21.0443.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.0455. COMPLAINTS REGARDING EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS. (a) The board shall propose rules necessary to establish a process for a candidate for teacher certification to direct a complaint against an educator preparation program to the agency.

(b) The board by rule shall require an educator preparation program to notify candidates for teacher certification of the complaint process adopted under Subsection (a). The notice must include the name, mailing address, telephone number, and Internet website address of the agency for the purpose of directing complaints to the agency. The educator preparation program shall provide for that notification:

(1) on the Internet website of the educator preparation program, if the program maintains a website; and

(2) on a sign prominently displayed in program facilities.

(c) The board shall post the complaint process adopted under Subsection (a) on the agency's Internet website.

(d) The board has no authority to arbitrate or resolve contractual or commercial issues between an educator preparation program and a candidate for teacher certification.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.046. QUALIFICATIONS FOR CERTIFICATION AS SUPERINTENDENT OR PRINCIPAL. (a) The qualifications for superintendent must permit a candidate for certification to substitute management training or experience for part of the educational experience.

(b) The qualifications for certification as a principal must be sufficiently flexible so that an outstanding teacher may qualify by substituting approved experience and professional training for part of the educational requirements. Supervised and approved on-the-job experience in addition to required internship shall be accepted in lieu of classroom hours. The qualifications must emphasize:

(1) instructional leadership, including the ability to create an inclusive school environment and to foster parent involvement;

(2) administration, supervision, and communication skills;

(3) curriculum and instruction management, including curriculum and instruction management for students with disabilities;

(4) performance evaluation;

(5) organization; and

(6) fiscal management.

(c) Because an effective principal is essential to school improvement, the board shall ensure that:

(1) each candidate for certification as a principal is of the highest caliber; and

(2) multi-level screening processes, validated comprehensive assessment programs, and flexible internships with successful mentors exist to determine whether a candidate for certification as a principal possesses the essential knowledge, skills, and leadership capabilities necessary for success.

(d) In creating the qualifications for certification as a principal, the board shall consider the knowledge, skills, and proficiencies for principals as developed by relevant national organizations and the State Board of Education.

(e) For purposes of satisfying eligibility requirements for certification as a principal, a teacher who is certified under Section 21.0487:

(1) is considered to hold a classroom teaching certificate; and

(2) may apply as creditable years of teaching experience as a classroom teacher any period during which the teacher was employed by a school district as a Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps instructor before or after the teacher was certified under Section 21.0487.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1194 (S.B. 1309), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.0462. QUALIFICATIONS FOR CERTIFICATION AS SCHOOL COUNSELOR. The qualifications for certification as a school counselor may not include a requirement that a candidate for certification have experience as a classroom teacher.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 344 (S.B. 798), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 21.047. CENTERS FOR PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT OF TEACHERS. (a) The board may develop the process for the establishment of centers for professional development through institutions of higher education for the purpose of integrating technology and innovative teaching practices in the preservice and staff development training of public school teachers and administrators. An institution of higher education with a teacher education program may develop a center through a collaborative process involving public schools, regional education service centers, and other entities or businesses. A center may contract with other entities to develop materials and provide training.

(b) On application by a center, the board shall make grants to the center for its programs from funds derived from gifts, grants, and legislative appropriations for that purpose. The board shall award the grants on a competitive basis according to requirements established by the board rules.

(c) A center may develop and implement a comprehensive field-based educator preparation program to supplement the internship hours required in Section 21.050. This comprehensive field-based teacher program must:

(1) be designed on the basis of current research into state-of-the-art teaching practices applicable to all students, including students with disabilities, curriculum theory and application within diverse student populations, evaluation of student outcomes, and the effective application of technology; and

(2) have rigorous internal and external evaluation procedures that focus on content, delivery systems, and teacher and student outcomes.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.048. CERTIFICATION EXAMINATIONS. (a) The board shall propose rules prescribing comprehensive examinations for each class of certificate issued by the board. The commissioner shall determine the satisfactory level of performance required for each certification examination. For the issuance of a generalist certificate, the commissioner shall require a satisfactory level of examination performance in each core subject covered by the examination.

(a-1) The board may not require that more than 45 days elapse before a person may retake an examination. A person may not retake an examination more than four times, unless the board waives the limitation for good cause as prescribed by the board.

(a-2) The board shall adopt rules that provide that in order to teach any grade level from prekindergarten through grade six a person must demonstrate proficiency in the science of teaching reading on a certification examination for each class of certificate issued by the board after January 1, 2021.

(b) The board may not administer a written examination to determine the competence or level of performance of an educator who has a hearing impairment unless the examination has been field tested to determine its appropriateness, reliability, and validity as applied to, and minimum acceptable performance scores for, persons with hearing impairments.

(c) An educator who has a hearing impairment is exempt from taking a written examination for a period ending on the first anniversary of the date on which the board determines, on the basis of appropriate field tests, that the examination complies with the standards specified in Subsection (b). On application to the board, the board shall issue a temporary exemption certificate to a person entitled to an exemption under this subsection.

(c-1) The results of an examination administered under this section are confidential and are not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, unless the disclosure is regarding notification to a parent of the assignment of an uncertified teacher to a classroom as required by Section 21.057.

(d) In this section:

(1) "Hearing impairment" means a hearing impairment so severe that the person cannot process linguistic information with or without amplification.

(2) "Reliability" means the extent to which an experiment, test, or measuring procedure yields the same results on repeated trials.

(3) "Validity" means being:

(A) well-grounded or justifiable;

(B) relevant and meaningful;

(C) correctly derived from premises or inferences; and

(D) supported by objective truth or generally accepted authority.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1372 (S.B. 9), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1282 (H.B. 2012), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1292 (H.B. 2318), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.005, eff. June 12, 2019.

Sec. 21.0485. CERTIFICATION TO TEACH STUDENTS WITH VISUAL IMPAIRMENTS. (a) To be eligible to be issued a certificate to teach students with visual impairments, a person must:

(1) complete either:

(A) all course work required for that certification in an approved educator preparation program; or

(B) an alternative educator certification program approved for the purpose by the board;

(2) perform satisfactorily on each examination prescribed under Section 21.048 for certification to teach students with visual impairments, after completing the course work or program described by Subdivision (1); and

(3) satisfy any other requirements prescribed by the board.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to eligibility for a certificate to teach students with visual impairments, including eligibility for renewal of that certificate, if the application for the initial certificate was submitted on or before September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 362 (S.B. 54), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 21.0486. TECHNOLOGY APPLICATIONS CERTIFICATION. A person who holds a technology applications certificate issued under this subchapter may, in addition to teaching technology applications courses as authorized under the certificate, teach courses in:

(1) principles of arts, audio/video technology, and communications; and

(2) principles of information technology.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1091 (H.B. 3573), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.0487. JUNIOR RESERVE OFFICER TRAINING CORPS TEACHER CERTIFICATION. (a) The board shall establish a standard Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps teaching certificate to provide Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps instruction.

(b) To be eligible for a certificate under this section, a person must:

(1) hold a bachelor's degree from an institution of higher education that is, and at the time the person received the degree was, accredited or otherwise approved by an accrediting organization recognized by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board;

(2) satisfy the eligibility and testing requirements for certification as a Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps instructor established by the branch of service in which the person served; and

(3) complete an approved educator preparation program.

(c) The board shall propose rules to:

(1) approve educator preparation programs to prepare a person as a teacher for certification under this section; and

(2) establish requirements under which:

(A) a person's training and experience acquired during the person's military service serves as proof of the person's demonstration of subject matter knowledge if that training and experience is verified by the branch of service in which the person served; and

(B) a person's employment by a school district as a Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps instructor before the person was enrolled in an educator preparation program or while the person is enrolled in an educator preparation program is applied to satisfy any student teaching, internship, or field-based experience program requirement.

(d) A person is not required to hold a certificate established under this section to be employed by a school district as a Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps instructor.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1194 (S.B. 1309), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 21.0488. TRADES AND INDUSTRIES EDUCATION CERTIFICATION FOR MILITARY PERSONNEL. (a) To the extent that rules adopted under this subchapter require a person seeking trades and industries education certification to hold a license or other professional credential for a specific trade, a person who is a current or former member of the United States armed services is considered to have satisfied that requirement if the person has experience in that trade obtained through military service.

(b) The board may not propose rules requiring a current or former member of the United States armed services who seeks career and technology education certification for a specific trade to hold a credential related to that trade or possess experience related to that trade other than the experience in that trade obtained through military service.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 755 (H.B. 2014), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 21.0487 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(5), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 21.0489. EARLY CHILDHOOD CERTIFICATION. (a) To ensure that there are teachers with special training in early childhood education focusing on prekindergarten through grade three, the board shall establish an early childhood certificate.

(b) A person is not required to hold a certificate established under this section to be employed by a school district to provide instruction in prekindergarten through grade three.

(c) To be eligible for a certificate established under this section, a person must:

(1) either:

(A) satisfactorily complete the course work for that certificate in an educator preparation program, including a knowledge-based and skills-based course of instruction on early childhood education that includes:

(i) teaching methods for:

(a) using small group instructional formats that focus on building social, emotional, and academic skills;

(b) navigating multiple content areas; and

(c) managing a classroom environment in which small groups of students are working on different tasks; and

(ii) strategies for teaching fundamental academic skills, including reading, writing, and numeracy; or

(B) hold an early childhood through grade six certificate issued under this subchapter and satisfactorily complete a course of instruction described by Paragraph (A);

(2) perform satisfactorily on an early childhood certificate examination prescribed by the board; and

(3) satisfy any other requirements prescribed by the board.

(d) The criteria for the course of instruction described by Subsection (c)(1)(A) shall be developed by the board in consultation with faculty members who provide instruction at institutions of higher education in educator preparation programs for an early childhood through grade six certificate.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 5, eff. June 12, 2017.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 837 (H.B. 2039), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 5.002, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.04891. BILINGUAL SPECIAL EDUCATION CERTIFICATION. (a) In this section, "limited English proficiency" has the meaning assigned by Section 29.052.

(b) To ensure that there are teachers with special training in providing instruction to students of limited English proficiency with disabilities, the board shall establish a bilingual special education certificate.

(c) To be eligible for a certificate established under this section, a person must:

(1) satisfactorily complete the coursework for that certificate in an educator preparation program, including a skills-based course of instruction on providing instruction to students of limited English proficiency with disabilities, which must include instruction on:

(A) the foundations of bilingual, multicultural, and second language special education;

(B) providing individualized education programs for students of limited English proficiency with disabilities;

(C) providing assessment of students of limited English proficiency with and without disabilities;

(D) developing teaching methods to recognize the intellectual, developmental, and emotional needs of students in dual language and transitional bilingual education settings;

(E) teaching fundamental academic skills, including reading, writing, and mathematics, to students of limited English proficiency; and

(F) creating partnerships with families and school professionals;

(2) perform satisfactorily on a bilingual special education certificate examination prescribed by the board; and

(3) satisfy any other requirements prescribed by the board.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 691 (H.B. 2256), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.049. ALTERNATIVE CERTIFICATION. (a) To provide a continuing additional source of qualified educators, the board shall propose rules providing for educator certification programs as an alternative to traditional educator preparation programs. The rules may not provide that a person may be certified under this section only if there is a demonstrated shortage of educators in a school district or subject area.

(b) The board may not require a person employed as a teacher in an alternative education program under Section 37.008 or a juvenile justice alternative education program under Section 37.011 for at least three years to complete an alternative educator certification program adopted under this section before taking the appropriate certification examination.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 609, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

See note following this section.

Sec. 21.0491. PROBATIONARY AND STANDARD TRADE AND INDUSTRIAL WORKFORCE TRAINING CERTIFICATES. (a) To provide a continuing additional source of teachers to provide workforce training, the board shall establish a probationary trade and industrial workforce training certificate and a standard trade and industrial workforce training certificate that may be obtained through an abbreviated educator preparation program under Section 21.0442.

(b) To be eligible for a probationary certificate under this section, a person must:

(1) satisfactorily complete the course work for that certificate in an educator preparation program under Section 21.0442; and

(2) satisfy any other requirements prescribed by the board.

(c) To be eligible for a standard certificate under this section, a person must:

(1) hold a probationary certificate issued under this section;

(2) be employed by:

(A) a public or private primary or secondary school; or

(B) an institution of higher education or an independent or private institution of higher education as those terms are defined by Section 61.003; and

(3) perform satisfactorily on a standard trade and industrial workforce training certificate examination prescribed by the board.

(d) The limitation imposed by Section 21.048(a-1) on the number of administrations of an examination does not apply to the administration of the standard trade and industrial workforce training certificate examination prescribed by the board.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may administer the standard trade and industrial workforce training certificate examination to a person who satisfies the requirements of Subsections (c)(1) and (2).

(f) The board shall propose rules to:

(1) specify the term of a probationary certificate and a standard certificate issued under this section; and

(2) establish the requirements for renewal of a standard certificate.

Text of section effective on June 15, 2017, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1077 (H.B. 3349), Sec. 3, which states: This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 85th Legislature.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1077 (H.B. 3349), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 21.050. ACADEMIC DEGREE REQUIRED FOR TEACHING CERTIFICATE; FIELD-BASED EXPERIENCE OR INTERNSHIP. (a) A person who applies for a teaching certificate for which board rules require a bachelor's degree must possess a bachelor's degree received with an academic major or interdisciplinary academic major, including reading, that is related to the curriculum as prescribed under Subchapter A, Chapter 28.

(b) The board shall provide for a minimum number of semester credit hours of field-based experience or internship to be included in the credit hours needed for certification. The board may propose rules requiring additional credit hours for certification in bilingual education, English as a second language, early childhood education, or special education.

(c) A person who receives a bachelor's degree required for a teaching certificate on the basis of higher education coursework completed while receiving an exemption from tuition and fees under Section 54.363 may not be required to participate in any field experience or internship consisting of student teaching to receive a teaching certificate.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 524, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 74, Sec. 2, eff. May 14, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (S.B. 32), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (H.B. 3217), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (H.B. 3217), Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 2019.

Sec. 21.051. RULES REGARDING FIELD-BASED EXPERIENCE AND OPTIONS FOR FIELD EXPERIENCE AND INTERNSHIPS. (a) In this section, "teacher of record" means a person employed by a school district who teaches the majority of the instructional day in an academic instructional setting and is responsible for evaluating student achievement and assigning grades.

(b) Before a school district may employ a candidate for certification as a teacher of record and, except as provided by Subsection (b-1), after the candidate's admission to an educator preparation program, the candidate must complete at least 15 hours of field-based experience in which the candidate is actively engaged in instructional or educational activities involving a diverse student population that, to the greatest extent practicable, includes students with disabilities under supervision at:

(1) a public school campus accredited or approved for the purpose by the agency; or

(2) a private school recognized or approved for the purpose by the agency.

(b-1) A candidate may satisfy up to 15 hours of the field-based experience requirement under Subsection (b) by serving as a long-term substitute teacher as prescribed by board rule. Experience under this subsection may occur after the candidate's admission to an educator preparation program or during the two years before the date the candidate is admitted to the program. The candidate's experience in instructional or educational activities must be documented by the educator preparation program and must be obtained at:

(1) a public school campus accredited or approved for the purpose by the agency; or

(2) a private school recognized or approved for the purpose by the agency.

(c) Subsection (b) applies only to an initial certification issued on or after September 1, 2012. Subsection (b) does not affect:

(1) the validity of a certification issued before September 1, 2012; or

(2) the eligibility of a person who holds a certification issued before September 1, 2012, to obtain a subsequent renewal of the certification in accordance with board rule.

(d) Subsection (b) does not affect the period within which an individual must complete field-based experience hours as determined by board rule if the individual is not accepted into an educator preparation program before the deadline prescribed by board rule and is hired for a teaching assignment by a school district after the deadline prescribed by board rule.

(e) The board shall propose rules relating to the field-based experience required by Subsection (b). The commissioner by rule shall adopt procedures and standards for recognizing a private school under Subsection (b)(2).

(f) The board shall propose rules providing flexible options for persons for any field-based experience or internship required for certification, including options for candidate observations that provide for at least:

(1) two observations to occur in person and two additional observations to occur in virtual settings that are equivalent in rigor to in-person options for observation; or

(2) three observations to occur in person.

(f-1) The options required under Subsection (f) must, to the greatest extent practicable, involve interaction with a diverse student population, including students with disabilities.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 2, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 6, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (S.B. 1590), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 15), Sec. 1, eff. September 9, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 6.006, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 21.052. CERTIFICATION OF EDUCATORS FROM OUTSIDE THE STATE. (a) The board may issue a certificate to an educator who applies for a certificate and:

(1) holds:

(A) a degree issued by an institution accredited by a regional accrediting agency or group that is recognized by a nationally recognized accreditation board; or

(B) a degree issued by an institution located in a foreign country, if the degree is equivalent to a degree described by Paragraph (A);

(2) holds an appropriate certificate or other credential issued by another state or country; and

(3) performs satisfactorily on:

(A) the examination prescribed under Section 21.048; or

(B) if the educator holds a certificate or other credential issued by another state or country, an examination similar to and at least as rigorous as that described by Paragraph (A) administered to the educator under the authority of that state.

(a-1) The commissioner may adopt rules establishing exceptions to the examination requirements prescribed by Subsection (a)(3) for an educator from outside the state, including military service members, military spouses, and military veterans, to obtain a certificate in this state.

(b) For purposes of Subsection (a)(2), a person is considered to hold a certificate or other credential if the credential is not valid solely because it has expired.

(b-1) The board shall propose rules in accordance with Chapter 55, Occupations Code, to establish procedures to expedite the processing of an application for a certificate under this section submitted by an educator who is a military veteran or military spouse, including rules for providing a permanent change of station order for purposes of establishing residency and for providing a military identification card.

(c) The board may issue a temporary certificate under this section to an educator who holds a degree required by Subsection (a)(1) and a certificate or other credential required by Subsection (a)(2) but who has not satisfied the requirements prescribed by Subsection (a)(3). Subject to Subsections (d) and (d-1), the board may specify the term of a temporary certificate issued under this subsection.

(d) A temporary certificate issued under Subsection (c) to an educator employed by a school district that has constructed or expanded at least one instructional facility as a result of increased student enrollment due to actions taken under the Defense Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990 (10 U.S.C. Section 2687) may not expire before the first anniversary of the date on which the board completes the review of the educator's credentials and informs the educator of the examination or examinations under Section 21.048 on which the educator must perform successfully to receive a standard certificate.

(d-1) A temporary certificate issued under Subsection (c) to an educator who is the spouse of a person who is serving on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States may not expire before the third anniversary of the date on which the board completes the review of the educator's credentials and informs the educator of the examination or examinations under Section 21.048 on which the educator must perform satisfactorily to receive a standard certificate.

(e) An educator who has submitted all documents required by the board for certification and who receives a temporary certificate as provided by Subsection (c) must perform satisfactorily on the examination prescribed under Section 21.048 not later than the first anniversary of the date the board completes the review of the educator's credentials and informs the educator of the examination or examinations under Section 21.048 on which the educator must perform successfully to receive a standard certificate.

(f) The board shall post on the board's Internet website the procedures for obtaining a certificate under Subsection (a) and the notice required under Section 55.010, Occupations Code.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 12(2), eff. June 12, 2017.

(h) This subsection applies only to an applicant who holds a certificate or other credential issued by another state in mathematics, science, special education, or bilingual education, or another subject area that the commissioner determines has a shortage of teachers. In any state fiscal year, the board shall accept or reject, not later than the 14th day after the date the board receives the completed application, at least 90 percent of the applications the board receives for a certificate under this subsection, and shall accept or reject all completed applications the board receives under this subsection not later than the 30th day after the date the board receives the completed application. An applicant under this subsection must submit:

(1) a letter of good standing from the state in which the teacher is certified on a form determined by the board;

(2) information necessary to complete a national criminal history record information review; and

(3) an application fee as required by the board.

(i) In this section:

(1) "Active duty" means current full-time military service in the armed forces of the United States or active duty military service as a member of the Texas military forces, as defined by Section 437.001, Government Code, or similar military service of another state.

(2) "Armed forces of the United States" means the army, navy, air force, space force, coast guard, or marine corps of the United States or a reserve unit of one of those branches of the armed forces.

(3) "Military service member" means a person who is on active duty.

(4) "Military spouse" means a person who is married to a military service member.

(5) "Military veteran" means a person who has served on active duty and who was discharged or released from active duty.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 577 (S.B. 1912), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1013 (H.B. 4152), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 7, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 12(2), eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1048 (H.B. 1934), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 46 (H.B. 139), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.0525. CERTIFICATION OF CERTAIN MILITARY INSTRUCTORS; TEMPORARY TEACHING CERTIFICATE. (a) The board shall propose rules providing for a person who holds a bachelor's degree and has at least two semesters' experience as a full-time instructor for the Community College of the Air Force to:

(1) be issued a temporary teaching certificate on the person's enrollment in an educator preparation program; and

(2) receive credit for the person's education, training, and clinical or professional experience as an instructor for the Community College of the Air Force toward the requirements for completion of an educator preparation program, including requirements regarding coursework, field-based experience, or clinical experience.

(b) A temporary teaching certificate issued under this section is valid for a term of one year from the date of issuance.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1073 (S.B. 544), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 21.053. PRESENTATION AND RECORDING OF CERTIFICATES. (a) A person who desires to teach in a public school shall present the person's certificate for filing with the employing district before the person's contract with the board of trustees of the district is binding.

(b) An educator who does not hold a valid certificate may not be paid for teaching or work done before the effective date of issuance of a valid certificate.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.054. CONTINUING EDUCATION. (a) The board shall propose rules establishing a process for identifying continuing education courses and programs that fulfill educators' continuing education requirements, including opportunities for educators to receive micro-credentials in fields of study related to the educator's certification class as provided by Subsection (i).

(a-1) Continuing education requirements for educators must include training regarding educating students with disabilities.

(b) Continuing education requirements for an educator who teaches students with dyslexia must include training regarding new research and practices in educating students with dyslexia.

(c) The training required under Subsection (b) may be offered in an online course.

(d) Subject to Subsection (d-2), continuing education requirements for a classroom teacher may not require that more than 25 percent of the training required every five years include instruction regarding:

(1) collecting and analyzing information that will improve effectiveness in the classroom;

(2) recognizing early warning indicators that a student may be at risk of dropping out of school;

(3) digital learning, digital teaching, and integrating technology into classroom instruction;

(4) educating diverse student populations, including:

(A) students who are educationally disadvantaged; and

(B) students at risk of dropping out of school; and

(5) understanding appropriate relationships, boundaries, and communications between educators and students.

(d-1) The instruction required under Subsection (d) may include two or more listed topics together.

(d-2) Training in a topic of instruction described by Subsection (d) attended by a classroom teacher in excess of an amount of hours equal to 25 percent of the training required of the teacher every five years shall be counted toward the teacher's overall training requirements.

(e) Continuing education requirements for a principal must provide that not more than 25 percent of the training required every five years include instruction regarding:

(1) effective and efficient management, including:

(A) collecting and analyzing information;

(B) making decisions and managing time; and

(C) supervising student discipline and managing behavior;

(2) recognizing early warning indicators that a student may be at risk of dropping out of school;

(3) digital learning, digital teaching, and integrating technology into campus curriculum and instruction;

(4) effective implementation of a comprehensive school counseling program under Section 33.005;

(5) mental health programs addressing a mental health condition;

(6) educating diverse student populations, including:

(A) students who are educationally disadvantaged;

(B) emergent bilingual students; and

(C) students at risk of dropping out of school; and

(7) preventing, recognizing, and reporting any sexual conduct between an educator and student that is prohibited under Section 21.12, Penal Code, or for which reporting is required under Section 21.006 of this code.

(f) Continuing education requirements for a counselor must provide that at least 25 percent of training required every five years include instruction regarding:

(1) assisting students in developing high school graduation plans;

(2) implementing dropout prevention strategies;

(3) informing students concerning:

(A) college admissions, including college financial aid resources and application procedures; and

(B) career opportunities;

(4) counseling students concerning mental health conditions and substance abuse, including through the use of grief-informed and trauma-informed interventions and crisis management and suicide prevention strategies; and

(5) effective implementation of a comprehensive school counseling program under Section 33.005.

(g) The board shall adopt rules that allow an educator to fulfill continuing education requirements by participating in an evidence-based mental health first aid training program or an evidence-based grief-informed and trauma-informed care program. The rules adopted under this subsection must allow an educator to complete a program described by this subsection and receive credit toward continuing education requirements for twice the number of hours of instruction provided under that program, not to exceed 16 hours. The program must be offered through a classroom instruction format that requires in-person attendance.

(h) Continuing education requirements for a superintendent must include at least 2-1/2 hours of training every five years on identifying and reporting potential victims of sexual abuse, human trafficking, and other maltreatment of children. For purposes of this subsection, "other maltreatment" has the meaning assigned by Section 42.002, Human Resources Code.

(i) The board shall propose rules establishing a program to issue micro-credentials in fields of study related to an educator's certification class. The agency shall approve continuing education providers to offer micro-credential courses. A micro-credential received by an educator shall be recorded on the agency's Educator Certification Online System (ECOS) and included as part of the educator's public certification records.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 675 (S.B. 143), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 596 (H.B. 200), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 67(a), eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (S.B. 866), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 638 (H.B. 642), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1306 (H.B. 3793), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (S.B. 179), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 8, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 214 (H.B. 403), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.04, eff. December 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 4, eff. June 6, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 2424), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2066), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 24(1), eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 24(2), eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 2929), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (H.B. 2929), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 21.0541. CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDIT FOR INSTRUCTION RELATED TO USE OF AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR. The board shall adopt rules allowing an educator to receive credit towards the educator's continuing education requirements for completion of an instructional course on the use of an automated external defibrillator that meets any guidelines for automated external defibrillator training approved by the board.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 382), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 545 (S.B. 199), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.0543. CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDIT FOR INSTRUCTION RELATED TO DIGITAL TECHNOLOGY. The board shall propose rules allowing an educator to receive credit toward the educator's continuing education requirements for completion of education courses that:

(1) use technology to increase the educator's digital literacy; and

(2) assist the educator in the use of digital technology in learning activities that improve teaching, assessment, and instructional practices.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 9, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 21.055. SCHOOL DISTRICT TEACHING PERMIT. (a) As provided by this section, a school district may issue a school district teaching permit and employ as a teacher a person who does not hold a teaching certificate issued by the board.

(b) To be eligible for a school district teaching permit under this section, a person must hold a baccalaureate degree.

(c) Promptly after employing a person under this section, a school district shall send to the commissioner a written statement identifying the person, the person's qualifications as a teacher, and the subject or class the person will teach. The person may teach the subject or class pending action by the commissioner.

(d) Not later than the 30th day after the date the commissioner receives the statement under Subsection (c), the commissioner may inform the district in writing that the commissioner finds the person is not qualified to teach. The person may not teach if the commissioner finds the person is not qualified. If the commissioner fails to act within the time prescribed by this subsection, the district may issue to the person a school district teaching permit and the person may teach the subject or class identified in the statement.

(d-1) Subsections (b), (c), and (d) do not apply to a person who will teach only noncore academic career and technical education courses. A school district board of trustees may issue a school district teaching permit to a person who will teach courses only in career and technical education based on qualifications certified by the superintendent of the school district. Qualifications must include demonstrated subject matter expertise such as professional work experience, formal training and education, holding an active professional relevant industry license, certification, or registration, or any combination of work experience, training and education, or industry license, certification, or registration, in the subject matter to be taught. The superintendent of the school district shall certify to the board of trustees that a new employee has undergone a criminal background check and is capable of proper classroom management. A school district shall require a new employee to obtain at least 20 hours of classroom management training and to comply with continuing education requirements as determined by the board of trustees. A person may teach a career and technical education course immediately upon issuance of a permit under this subsection. Promptly after employing a person who qualifies under this subsection, the board of trustees shall send to the commissioner a written statement identifying the person, the course the person will teach, and the person's qualifications to teach the course.

(e) A person authorized to teach under this section may not teach in another school district unless that district complies with this section. A school district teaching permit remains valid unless the district issuing the permit revokes it for cause.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.056. ADDITIONAL CERTIFICATION. The board by rule shall provide for a certified educator to qualify for additional certification to teach at a grade level or in a subject area not covered by the educator's certificate upon satisfactory completion of an examination or other assessment of the educator's qualification.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1356, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 21.057. PARENTAL NOTIFICATION. (a) A school district that assigns an inappropriately certified or uncertified teacher to the same classroom for more than 30 consecutive instructional days during the same school year shall provide written notice of the assignment to a parent or guardian of each student in that classroom.

(b) The superintendent of the school district shall provide the notice required by Subsection (a) not later than the 30th instructional day after the date of the assignment of the inappropriately certified or uncertified teacher.

(c) The school district shall:

(1) make a good-faith effort to ensure that the notice required by this section is provided in a bilingual form to any parent or guardian whose primary language is not English;

(2) retain a copy of any notice provided under this section; and

(3) make information relating to teacher certification available to the public on request.

(d) For purposes of this section, "inappropriately certified or uncertified teacher":

(1) includes:

(A) an individual serving on an emergency certificate issued under Section 21.041(b)(2); or

(B) an individual who does not hold any certificate or permit issued under this chapter and is not employed as specified by Subdivision (2)(E); and

(2) does not include an individual:

(A) who is a certified teacher assigned to teach a class or classes outside his or her area of certification, as determined by rules proposed by the board in specifying the certificate required for each assignment;

(B) serving on a certificate issued due to a hearing impairment under Section 21.048;

(C) serving on a certificate issued pursuant to enrollment in an approved alternative certification program under Section 21.049;

(D) certified by another state or country and serving on a certificate issued under Section 21.052;

(E) serving on a school district teaching permit issued under Section 21.055; or

(F) employed under a waiver granted by the commissioner pursuant to Section 7.056.

(e) This section does not apply if a school is required in accordance with Section 1006, Every Student Succeeds Act (20 U.S.C. Section 6312(e)(1)(B)(ii)), to provide notice to a parent or guardian regarding a teacher who does not meet certification requirements at the grade level and subject area in which the teacher is assigned, provided the school provides notice as required by that Act.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1027, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (H.B. 3563), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2017.

Sec. 21.058. REVOCATION OF CERTIFICATE AND TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT BASED ON CONVICTION OF OR PLACEMENT ON DEFERRED ADJUDICATION COMMUNITY SUPERVISION FOR CERTAIN OFFENSES. (a) The procedures described by Subsections (b) and (c) apply only to:

(1) conviction of or placement on deferred adjudication community supervision for an offense for which a defendant is required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(2) conviction of a felony offense under Title 5, Penal Code, if the victim of the offense was under 18 years of age at the time the offense was committed; or

(3) conviction of or placement on deferred adjudication community supervision for an offense under Section 43.24, Penal Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21.041(b)(7), not later than the fifth day after the date the board receives notice under Article 42.018, Code of Criminal Procedure, of the conviction or placement on deferred adjudication community supervision of a person who holds a certificate under this subchapter, the board shall:

(1) revoke the certificate held by the person; and

(2) provide to the person, to the agency, and to any school district or open-enrollment charter school employing the person at the time of revocation written notice of:

(A) the revocation; and

(B) the basis for the revocation.

(c) A school district or open-enrollment charter school that receives notice under Subsection (b) of the revocation of a certificate issued under this subchapter shall:

(1) immediately remove the person whose certificate has been revoked from campus or from an administrative office, as applicable, to prevent the person from having any contact with a student; and

(2) if the person is employed under a probationary, continuing, or term contract under this chapter, with the approval of the board of trustees or governing body or a designee of the board or governing body:

(A) suspend the person without pay;

(B) provide the person with written notice that the person's contract is void as provided by Subsection (c-2); and

(C) terminate the employment of the person as soon as practicable.

(c-1) If a school district or open-enrollment charter school becomes aware that a person employed by the district or school under a probationary, continuing, or term contract under this chapter has been convicted of or received deferred adjudication for a felony offense, and the person is not subject to Subsection (c), the district or school may, with the approval of the board of trustees or governing body or a designee of the board of trustees or governing body:

(1) suspend the person without pay;

(2) provide the person with written notice that the person's contract is void as provided by Subsection (c-2); and

(3) terminate the employment of the person as soon as practicable.

(c-2) A person's probationary, continuing, or term contract is void if, with the approval of the board of trustees or governing body or a designee of the board or governing body, the school district or open-enrollment charter school takes action under Subsection (c)(2)(B) or (c-1)(2).

(d) A person whose certificate is revoked under Subsection (b) may reapply for a certificate in accordance with board rules.

(e) Action taken by a school district or open-enrollment charter school under Subsection (c) or (c-1) is not subject to appeal under this chapter, and the notice and hearing requirements of this chapter do not apply to the action.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 920, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 761 (H.B. 1610), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4520), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 21.0581. REVOCATION FOR ASSISTING PERSON WHO ENGAGED IN SEXUAL MISCONDUCT OBTAIN EMPLOYMENT. (a) The board may suspend or revoke a certificate held by a person under this subchapter, impose other sanctions against the person, or refuse to issue a certificate to the person under this subchapter if:

(1) the person assists another person in obtaining employment at a school district, private school, or open-enrollment charter school, other than by the routine transmission of administrative and personnel files; and

(2) the person knew that the other person has previously engaged in sexual misconduct with a minor or student in violation of the law.

(b) The commissioner may require a school district to revoke or decline to issue a school district teaching permit under Section 21.055 issued to or requested by a person subject to board action under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 986 (S.B. 1230), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.0585. NOTICE TO AGENCY REGARDING REVOCATION OF CERTIFICATE OR PERMIT FOR CERTAIN MISCONDUCT. The board shall promptly notify the agency for purposes of Section 22.092 if the board revokes a certificate or permit of a person on a finding that the person engaged in misconduct described by Section 21.006(b)(2)(A) or (A-1).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2A.012, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.059. EXTENSION OF CERTAIN DEADLINES FOR ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL. A person who holds a certificate or permit under this subchapter who is a member of the state military forces or a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States and who is ordered to active duty by proper authority is entitled to an additional amount of time, equal to the total number of years or parts of years that the educator serves on active duty, to complete:

(1) any continuing education requirements; and

(2) any requirements relating to renewal or extension of the person's certificate or permit.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 675 (S.B. 143), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 21.060. ELIGIBILITY OF PERSONS CONVICTED OF CERTAIN OFFENSES. The board may suspend or revoke the certificate or permit held by a person under this subchapter, impose other sanctions against the person, or refuse to issue a certificate or permit to a person under this subchapter if the person has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor offense relating to the duties and responsibilities of the education profession, including:

(1) an offense involving moral turpitude;

(2) an offense involving a form of sexual or physical abuse of a minor or student or other illegal conduct in which the victim is a minor or student;

(3) a felony offense involving the possession, transfer, sale, or distribution of or conspiracy to possess, transfer, sell, or distribute a controlled substance, as defined by Chapter 481, Health and Safety Code, or by 21 U.S.C. Section 801 et seq.;

(4) an offense involving the illegal transfer, appropriation, or use of school district funds or other district property; or

(5) an offense involving an attempt by fraudulent or unauthorized means to obtain or alter a professional certificate or license issued under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1372 (S.B. 9), Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 21.061. REVIEW AND UPDATING OF EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS. The board shall, after consulting with appropriate higher education faculty and public school teachers and administrators and soliciting advice from other interested persons with relevant knowledge and experience, develop and carry out a process for reviewing and, as necessary, updating standards and requirements for educator preparation programs.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1292 (H.B. 2318), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.062. ISSUANCE OF SUBPOENAS. (a) During an investigation by the commissioner of an educator for an alleged incident of misconduct, the commissioner may issue a subpoena to compel:

(1) the attendance of a relevant witness; or

(2) the production, for inspection or copying, of relevant evidence that is located in this state.

(b) A subpoena may be served personally or by certified mail.

(c) If a person fails to comply with a subpoena, the commissioner, acting through the attorney general, may file suit to enforce the subpoena in a district court in this state. On finding that good cause exists for issuing the subpoena, the court shall order the person to comply with the subpoena. The court may punish a person who fails to obey the court order.

(d) All information and materials subpoenaed or compiled in connection with an investigation described by Subsection (a) are confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(e) Except as provided by a protective order, and notwithstanding Subsection (d), all information and materials subpoenaed or compiled in connection with an investigation described by Subsection (a) may be used in a disciplinary proceeding against an educator based on an alleged incident of misconduct.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 931 (H.B. 2205), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 21.063. TEACHER DESIGNATIONS ON CERTIFICATE. The board shall place on or remove from a teacher's certificate the appropriate designation issued to the teacher under Section 21.3521:

(1) after being notified by the agency of the issuance or removal of the designation; or

(2) if the board determines that removal of the designation is necessary because of action taken against the teacher's certificate.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.006, eff. June 12, 2019.

Sec. 21.064. LEGACY MASTER TEACHER CERTIFICATIONS. (a) The board shall recognize a master teacher certificate issued under former Section 21.0481, 21.0482, 21.0483, or 21.0484 until the certificate expires. The board shall note a designation of "legacy" on the certificate.

(b) A master teacher certificate described by Subsection (a) is not eligible for funding under the teacher incentive allotment under Section 48.112.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.006, eff. June 12, 2019.

Sec. 21.065. NOTICE TO TEACHER REGARDING SUSPENSION OF CERTIFICATE OR PERMIT. (a) In this section, "teacher" means a superintendent, principal, supervisor, classroom teacher, school counselor, paraprofessional, or other full-time professional employee who is required to hold a certificate issued under this subchapter.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), on the suspension of a teacher's certificate or permit issued under this subchapter, the board shall promptly notify the teacher of the suspension. The notice must include:

(1) the basis for the suspension; and

(2) information regarding the method in which the teacher may respond to the suspension.

(c) Subsection (b) does not apply to the suspension of a teacher's certificate or permit by an agreed order.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1030 (H.B. 2519), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. PROBATIONARY CONTRACTS

Sec. 21.101. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "teacher" means a principal, supervisor, classroom teacher, school counselor, or other full-time professional employee who is required to hold a certificate issued under Subchapter B or a nurse. The term does not include a superintendent or a person who is not entitled to a probationary, continuing, or term contract under Section 21.002, an existing contract, or district policy.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.102. PROBATIONARY CONTRACT. (a) Except as provided by Section 21.202(b), a person who is employed as a teacher by a school district for the first time, or who has not been employed by the district for two consecutive school years subsequent to August 28, 1967, shall be employed under a probationary contract. A person who previously was employed as a teacher by a district and, after at least a two-year lapse in district employment returns to district employment, may be employed under a probationary contract.

(a-1) A person who voluntarily accepts an assignment in a new professional capacity that requires a different class of certificate under Subchapter B than the class of certificate held by the person in the professional capacity in which the person was previously employed may be employed under a probationary contract. This subsection does not apply to a person who is returned by a school district to a professional capacity in which the person was employed by the district before the district employed the person in the new professional capacity as described by this subsection. A person described by this subsection who is returned to a previous professional capacity is entitled to be employed in the original professional capacity under the same contractual status as the status held by the person during the previous employment by the district in that capacity.

(b) A probationary contract may not be for a term exceeding one school year. The probationary contract may be renewed for two additional one-year periods, for a maximum permissible probationary contract period of three school years, except that the probationary period may not exceed one year for a person who has been employed as a teacher in public education for at least five of the eight years preceding employment by the district.

(c) An employment contract may not extend the probationary contract period beyond the end of the third consecutive school year of the teacher's employment by the school district unless, during the third year of a teacher's probationary contract, the board of trustees determines that it is doubtful whether the teacher should be given a continuing contract or a term contract. If the board makes that determination, the district may make a probationary contract with the teacher for a term ending with the fourth consecutive school year of the teacher's employment with the district, at which time the district shall:

(1) terminate the employment of the teacher; or

(2) employ the teacher under a continuing contract or a term contract as provided by Subchapter D or E, according to district policy.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 440, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1232, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 5.002, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1010 (H.B. 2380), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 21.103. PROBATIONARY CONTRACT: TERMINATION. (a) The board of trustees of a school district may terminate the employment of a teacher employed under a probationary contract at the end of the contract period if in the board's judgment the best interests of the district will be served by terminating the employment. The board of trustees must give notice of its decision to terminate the employment to the teacher not later than the 10th day before the last day of instruction required under the contract. The notice must be delivered personally by hand delivery to the teacher on the campus at which the teacher is employed, except that if the teacher is not present on the campus on the date that hand delivery is attempted, the notice must be mailed by prepaid certified mail or delivered by express delivery service to the teacher's address of record with the district. Notice that is postmarked on or before the 10th day before the last day of instruction is considered timely given under this subsection. The board's decision is final and may not be appealed.

(b) If the board of trustees fails to give the notice of its decision to terminate the teacher's employment within the time prescribed by Subsection (a), the board must employ the probationary teacher in the same capacity under:

(1) a probationary contract for the following school year, if the teacher has been employed by the district under a probationary contract for less than three consecutive school years; or

(2) a continuing or term contract, according to district policy, if the teacher has been employed by the district under a probationary contract for three consecutive school years.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 3, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.104. DISCHARGE DURING YEAR OR SUSPENSION WITHOUT PAY UNDER PROBATIONARY CONTRACT. (a) A teacher employed under a probationary contract may be discharged at any time for good cause as determined by the board of trustees, good cause being the failure to meet the accepted standards of conduct for the profession as generally recognized and applied in similarly situated school districts in this state.

(b) In lieu of discharge or pending discharge, a school district may suspend a teacher without pay for good cause as specified by Subsection (a) for a period not to extend beyond the end of the current school year.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 4, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.1041. HEARING UNDER PROBATIONARY CONTRACT. A teacher is entitled to:

(1) a hearing as provided by Subchapter F, if the teacher is protesting proposed action under Section 21.104; or

(2) a hearing in a manner provided under Section 21.207 for nonrenewal of a term contract or a hearing provided by Subchapter F, as determined by the board of trustees of the district, if the teacher is protesting proposed action to terminate a probationary contract before the end of the contract period on the basis of a financial exigency declared under Section 44.011 that requires a reduction in personnel.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 5, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.105. RESIGNATIONS UNDER PROBATIONARY CONTRACT. (a) A teacher employed under a probationary contract for the following school year may relinquish the position and leave the employment of the district at the end of a school year without penalty by filing with the board of trustees or its designee a written resignation not later than the 45th day before the first day of instruction of the following school year. A written resignation mailed by prepaid certified or registered mail to the president of the board of trustees or the board's designee at the post office address of the district is considered filed at the time of mailing.

(b) A teacher employed under a probationary contract may resign, with the consent of the board of trustees or the board's designee, at any other time.

(c) Subject to Subsections (e) and (f), on written complaint by the employing district, the State Board for Educator Certification may impose sanctions against a teacher employed under a probationary contract who:

(1) resigns;

(2) fails without good cause to comply with Subsection (a) or (b); and

(3) fails to perform the contract.

(d) If a school district submits a complaint regarding a teacher to the State Board for Educator Certification under Subsection (c), the district shall promptly notify the teacher of the complaint. The notice must include:

(1) the basis of the complaint;

(2) information regarding how the teacher may contact the State Board for Educator Certification; and

(3) a reminder that the teacher should verify that the teacher's mailing address on file with the State Board for Educator Certification is current.

(e) Before imposing sanctions against a teacher under Subsection (c), the State Board for Educator Certification:

(1) must consider any mitigating factors relevant to the teacher's conduct; and

(2) may consider alternatives to sanctions, including additional continuing education or training.

(f) If a teacher fails to timely file a written resignation as required by Subsection (a) but files a written resignation in the manner provided by that subsection not later than the 30th day before the first day of instruction of the following school year, the State Board for Educator Certification may not suspend or revoke the teacher's certificate under Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1030 (H.B. 2519), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.106. RETURN TO PROBATIONARY STATUS. (a) In lieu of discharging a teacher employed under a continuing contract, terminating a teacher employed under a term contract, or not renewing a teacher's term contract, a school district may, with the written consent of the teacher, return the teacher to probationary contract status.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a teacher may agree to be returned to probationary contract status only after receiving written notice that the board of trustees of the school district has proposed discharge, termination, or nonrenewal.

(c) A teacher returned to probationary contract status must serve a new probationary contract period as provided by Section 21.102 as if the teacher were employed by the district for the first time.

(d) A teacher may agree to be returned to probationary contract status after receiving written notice of the superintendent's intent to recommend discharge, termination, or nonrenewal. Notice under this subsection must inform the teacher of the school district's offer to return the teacher to probationary contract status, the period during which the teacher may consider the offer, and the teacher's right to seek counsel. The district must provide the teacher at least three business days after the date the teacher receives notice under this subsection to agree to be returned to probationary contract status. This subsection does not require a superintendent to provide notice of an intent to recommend discharge, termination, or nonrenewal.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 507, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER D. CONTINUING CONTRACTS

Sec. 21.151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "teacher" has the meaning assigned by Section 21.101.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.152. CONTINUING CONTRACT. A continuing contract must be in writing and must include the terms of employment prescribed by this subchapter and any other appropriate provisions consistent with this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.153. CONVERSION OF PROBATIONARY CONTRACT TO CONTINUING CONTRACT. (a) A school district that employs a teacher under a probationary contract for the third or, if permitted, fourth consecutive year of service and that elects to employ the teacher in future years under a continuing contract shall notify the teacher in writing of the teacher's election to continuing contract status. The teacher must, not later than the 30th day after the date of notification, file with the superintendent of the school district written notification of the teacher's acceptance of the continuing contract, beginning with the school year following the conclusion of the teacher's period of probationary contract employment.

(b) If the teacher fails to accept the contract within the period prescribed by Subsection (a), the teacher is considered to have refused to accept the contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.154. STATUS UNDER CONTINUING CONTRACT. Each teacher employed under a continuing contract is entitled to continue in the teacher's position or a position with the school district for future school years without the necessity for annual nomination or reappointment until the person:

(1) resigns;

(2) retires under the Teacher Retirement System of Texas;

(3) is released from employment by the school district at the end of a school year because of necessary reduction of personnel as provided by Section 21.157;

(4) is discharged for good cause as defined by Section 21.156 and in accordance with the procedures provided by this chapter;

(5) is discharged for a reason stated in the teacher's contract that existed on or before September 1, 1995, and in accordance with the procedures prescribed by this chapter; or

(6) is returned to probationary status, as authorized by Section 21.106.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.155. ADMINISTRATIVE PERSONNEL UNDER CONTINUING CONTRACT. The district may grant to a person who has served as principal or in another administrative position for which certification is required, at the completion of the person's service in that capacity, a continuing contract to serve as a teacher if the person qualifies for that position under criteria adopted by the board of trustees. The period of service in an administrative capacity is construed as contract service as a teacher within the meaning of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.156. DISCHARGE OR SUSPENSION WITHOUT PAY UNDER CONTINUING CONTRACT. (a) A teacher employed under a continuing contract may be discharged at any time for good cause as determined by the board of trustees, good cause being the failure to meet the accepted standards of conduct for the profession as generally recognized and applied in similarly situated school districts in this state.

(b) In lieu of discharge or pending discharge, a school district may suspend a teacher without pay for good cause as specified by Subsection (a) for a period not to extend beyond the end of the current school year.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 6, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.157. NECESSARY REDUCTION OF PERSONNEL. A teacher employed under a continuing contract may be released at the end of a school year and the teacher's employment with the school district terminated at that time because of a necessary reduction of personnel by the school district, with those reductions made primarily based upon teacher appraisals administered under Section 21.352 in the specific teaching fields and other criteria as determined by the board.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 7, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.158. NOTICE UNDER CONTINUING CONTRACT. (a) Before a teacher employed under a continuing contract may be discharged, suspended without pay, or released because of a necessary reduction of personnel, the board of trustees must notify the teacher in writing of the proposed action and the grounds for the action.

(b) A teacher who is discharged or suspended without pay for actions related to the inability or failure of the teacher to perform assigned duties is entitled, as a matter of right, to a copy of each evaluation report or any other written memorandum that concerns the fitness or conduct of the teacher, by requesting in writing a copy of those documents.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.159. HEARING UNDER CONTINUING CONTRACT. (a) If the teacher desires to protest the proposed action under Section 21.156 or 21.157, the teacher must notify the board of trustees in writing not later than the 10th day after the date the teacher receives the notice under Section 21.158.

(b) A teacher who notifies the board of trustees within the time prescribed by Subsection (a) is entitled to:

(1) a hearing as provided by Subchapter F, if the teacher is protesting proposed action under Section 21.156; or

(2) a hearing in a manner provided under Section 21.207 for nonrenewal of a term contract or a hearing provided by Subchapter F, as determined by the board, if the teacher is protesting proposed action under Section 21.157 or proposed action to terminate a term contract at any time on the basis of a financial exigency declared under Section 44.011 that requires a reduction in personnel.

(c) If the teacher does not request a hearing within the time prescribed by Subsection (a), the board of trustees shall:

(1) take the appropriate action; and

(2) notify the teacher in writing of the action not later than the 30th day after the date the board sent the notice of the proposed action under Section 21.158.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 8, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.160. RESIGNATION UNDER CONTINUING CONTRACT. (a) A teacher employed under a continuing contract may relinquish the position and leave the employment of the district at the end of a school year without penalty by filing with the board of trustees or its designee a written resignation not later than the 45th day before the first day of instruction of the following school year. A written resignation mailed by prepaid certified or registered mail to the president of the board of trustees or the board's designee at the post office address of the district is considered filed at time of mailing.

(b) A teacher employed under a continuing contract may resign, with the consent of the board of trustees or the board's designee, at any other time.

(c) Subject to Subsections (e) and (f), on written complaint by the employing district, the State Board for Educator Certification may impose sanctions against a teacher who is employed under a continuing contract that obligates the district to employ the person for the following school year and who:

(1) resigns;

(2) fails without good cause to comply with Subsection (a) or (b); and

(3) fails to perform the contract.

(d) If a school district submits a complaint regarding a teacher to the State Board for Educator Certification under Subsection (c), the district shall promptly notify the teacher of the complaint. The notice must include:

(1) the basis of the complaint;

(2) information regarding how the teacher may contact the State Board for Educator Certification; and

(3) a reminder that the teacher should verify that the teacher's mailing address on file with the State Board for Educator Certification is current.

(e) Before imposing sanctions against a teacher under Subsection (c), the State Board for Educator Certification:

(1) must consider any mitigating factors relevant to the teacher's conduct; and

(2) may consider alternatives to sanctions, including additional continuing education or training.

(f) If a teacher fails to timely file a written resignation as required by Subsection (a) but files a written resignation in the manner provided by that subsection not later than the 30th day before the first day of instruction of the following school year, the State Board for Educator Certification may not suspend or revoke the teacher's certificate under Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1030 (H.B. 2519), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER E. TERM CONTRACTS

Sec. 21.201. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Teacher" means a superintendent, principal, supervisor, classroom teacher, school counselor, or other full-time professional employee who is required to hold a certificate issued under Subchapter B or a nurse. The term does not include a person who is not entitled to a probationary, continuing, or term contract under Section 21.002, an existing contract, or district policy.

(2) "School district" means any public school district in this state.

(3) "Term contract" means any contract of employment for a fixed term between a school district and a teacher.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 10, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.202. PROBATIONARY CONTRACT REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), before a teacher may be employed under a term contract, the teacher must be employed under a probationary contract for the period provided by Subchapter C.

(b) A school district may employ a person as a principal or classroom teacher under a term contract if the person has experience as a public school principal or classroom teacher, respectively, regardless of whether the person is being employed by the school district for the first time or whether a probationary contract would otherwise be required under Section 21.102.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1232, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 21.203. EMPLOYMENT POLICIES. (a) Except as provided by Section 21.352(c), the employment policies adopted by a board of trustees must require a written evaluation of each teacher at annual or more frequent intervals. The board must consider the most recent evaluations before making a decision not to renew a teacher's contract if the evaluations are relevant to the reason for the board's action.

(b) The employment policies must include reasons for not renewing a teacher's contract at the end of a school year.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 244, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2003.

Sec. 21.204. TERM CONTRACT. (a) A term contract must be in writing and must include the terms of employment prescribed by this subchapter.

(b) The board of trustees may include in the contract other provisions that are consistent with this subchapter.

(c) Each contract under this subchapter is subject to approval by the board of trustees.

(d) The board of trustees shall provide each teacher with a copy of the teacher's contract with the school district and, on the teacher's request, a copy of the board's employment policies. If the district has an Internet website, the district shall place the board's employment policies on that website. At each school in the district, the board shall make a copy of the board's employment policies available for inspection at a reasonable time on request.

(e) A teacher does not have a property interest in a contract beyond its term.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 484, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 21.205. TERM OF CONTRACT. Once a teacher has completed the probationary contract period, the term of a contract under this subchapter may not exceed five school years.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.206. NOTICE OF CONTRACT RENEWAL OR NONRENEWAL. (a) Not later than the 10th day before the last day of instruction in a school year, the board of trustees shall notify in writing each teacher whose contract is about to expire whether the board proposes to renew or not renew the contract. The notice must be delivered personally by hand delivery to the teacher on the campus at which the teacher is employed, except that if the teacher is not present on the campus on the date that hand delivery is attempted, the notice must be mailed by prepaid certified mail or delivered by express delivery service to the teacher's address of record with the district. Notice that is postmarked on or before the 10th day before the last day of instruction is considered timely given under this subsection.

(b) The board's failure to give the notice required by Subsection (a) within the time specified constitutes an election to employ the teacher in the same professional capacity for the following school year.

(c) This section does not apply to a term contract with a superintendent.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 9, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.207. HEARING UNDER TERM CONTRACT. (a) If the teacher desires a hearing after receiving notice of the proposed nonrenewal, the teacher shall notify the board of trustees in writing not later than the 15th day after the date the teacher receives hand delivery of the notice of the proposed action, or if the notice is mailed by prepaid certified mail or delivered by express delivery service, not later than the 15th day after the date the notice is delivered to the teacher's address of record with the district. The board shall provide for a hearing to be held not later than the 15th day after the date the board receives the request for a hearing unless the parties agree in writing to a different date. The hearing must be closed unless the teacher requests an open hearing.

(b) The hearing must be conducted in accordance with rules adopted by the board. The board may use the process established under Subchapter F.

(b-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, this subsection applies only to a school district with an enrollment of at least 5,000 students. The board of trustees may designate an attorney licensed to practice law in this state to hold the hearing on behalf of the board, to create a hearing record for the board's consideration and action, and to recommend an action to the board. The attorney serving as the board's designee may not be employed by a school district and neither the designee nor a law firm with which the designee is associated may be serving as an agent or representative of a school district, of a teacher in a dispute between a district and a teacher, or of an organization of school employees, school administrators, or school boards of trustees. Not later than the 15th day after the completion of the hearing under this subsection, the board's designee shall provide to the board a record of the hearing and the designee's recommendation of whether the contract should be renewed or not renewed. The board shall consider the record of the hearing and the designee's recommendation at the first board meeting for which notice can be posted in compliance with Chapter 551, Government Code, following the receipt of the record and recommendation from the board's designee, unless the parties agree in writing to a different date. At the meeting, the board shall consider the hearing record and the designee's recommendation and allow each party to present an oral argument to the board. The board by written policy may limit the amount of time for oral argument. The policy must provide equal time for each party. The board may obtain advice concerning legal matters from an attorney who has not been involved in the proceedings. The board may accept, reject, or modify the designee's recommendation. The board shall notify the teacher in writing of the board's decision not later than the 15th day after the date of the meeting.

(c) At the hearing before the board or the board's designee, the teacher may:

(1) be represented by a representative of the teacher's choice;

(2) hear the evidence supporting the reason for nonrenewal;

(3) cross-examine adverse witnesses; and

(4) present evidence.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 10, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.208. DECISION OF BOARD. (a) If the teacher does not request a hearing, the board of trustees shall:

(1) take the appropriate action to renew or not renew the teacher's contract; and

(2) notify the teacher in writing of that action not later than the 30th day after the date the notice of proposed nonrenewal was sent to the teacher.

(b) If the teacher requests a hearing, following the hearing the board of trustees shall:

(1) take the appropriate action to renew or not renew the teacher's contract; and

(2) notify the teacher in writing of that action not later than the 15th day after the date on which the hearing is concluded.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.209. APPEAL. A teacher who is aggrieved by a decision of a board of trustees on the nonrenewal of the teacher's term contract may appeal to the commissioner for a review of the decision of the board of trustees in accordance with the provisions of Subchapter G. The commissioner may not substitute the commissioner's judgment for that of the board of trustees unless the board's decision was arbitrary, capricious, unlawful, or not supported by substantial evidence.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.210. RESIGNATION UNDER TERM CONTRACT. (a) A teacher employed under a term contract with a school district may relinquish the teaching position and leave the employment of the district at the end of a school year without penalty by filing a written resignation with the board of trustees or the board's designee not later than the 45th day before the first day of instruction of the following school year. A written resignation mailed by prepaid certified or registered mail to the president of the board of trustees or the board's designee at the post office address of the district is considered filed at the time of mailing.

(b) A teacher employed under a term contract may resign, with the consent of the board of trustees or the board's designee, at any other time.

(c) Subject to Subsections (e) and (f), on written complaint by the employing district, the State Board for Educator Certification may impose sanctions against a teacher who is employed under a term contract that obligates the district to employ the person for the following school year and who:

(1) resigns;

(2) fails without good cause to comply with Subsection (a) or (b); and

(3) fails to perform the contract.

(d) If a school district submits a complaint regarding a teacher to the State Board for Educator Certification under Subsection (c), the district shall promptly notify the teacher of the complaint. The notice must include:

(1) the basis of the complaint;

(2) information regarding how the teacher may contact the State Board for Educator Certification; and

(3) a reminder that the teacher should verify that the teacher's mailing address on file with the State Board for Educator Certification is current.

(e) Before imposing sanctions against a teacher under Subsection (c), the State Board for Educator Certification:

(1) must consider any mitigating factors relevant to the teacher's conduct; and

(2) may consider alternatives to sanctions, including additional continuing education or training.

(f) If a teacher fails to timely file a written resignation as required by Subsection (a) but files a written resignation in the manner provided by that subsection not later than the 30th day before the first day of instruction of the following school year, the State Board for Educator Certification may not suspend or revoke the teacher's certificate under Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1030 (H.B. 2519), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.211. TERMINATION OR SUSPENSION. (a) The board of trustees may terminate a term contract and discharge a teacher at any time for:

(1) good cause as determined by the board; or

(2) a financial exigency that requires a reduction in personnel.

(b) For a good cause, as determined by the board, the board of trustees may suspend a teacher without pay for a period not to extend beyond the end of the school year:

(1) pending discharge of the teacher; or

(2) in lieu of terminating the teacher.

(c) A teacher who is not discharged after being suspended without pay pending discharge is entitled to back pay for the period of suspension.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.212. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER TO SUPERINTENDENTS. (a) The board of trustees of a school district may choose to not renew the employment of a superintendent employed under a term contract, effective at the end of the contract period. If a majority of the board of trustees determines that the term contract of the superintendent should be considered for nonrenewal, the board shall give the superintendent written notice, containing reasonable notice of the reason for the proposed nonrenewal, not later than the 30th day before the last day of the contract term.

(b) If the board of trustees fails to give notice of the proposed nonrenewal within the time specified by Subsection (a), the board of trustees shall employ the superintendent in the same professional capacity for the following school year.

(c) If the superintendent, not later than the 15th day after receiving notice of the board's proposed action, does not request a hearing with the board of trustees under Section 21.207, the board of trustees shall:

(1) take the appropriate action; and

(2) notify the superintendent in writing of the action not later than the 30th day after the date the board sends the notice of the proposed nonrenewal.

(d) The board of trustees shall adopt policies that establish reasons for nonrenewal. This section does not prohibit a board of trustees from discharging a superintendent for good cause during the term of a contract.

(e) A superintendent employed under a term contract may leave the employment of the district at the end of a school year without penalty by filing a written resignation with the board of trustees. The resignation must be addressed to the board and filed not later than the 45th day before the first day of instruction of the following school year. A superintendent may resign, with the consent of the board of trustees, at any other time.

(f) On the basis of a financial exigency declared under Section 44.011 that requires a reduction in personnel, the board of trustees of a school district may choose to amend the terms of the contract of a superintendent employed under a term contract. A superintendent whose contract is amended under this subsection may resign without penalty by providing reasonable notice to the board and may continue employment for that notice period under the prior contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 11, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.213. NONAPPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. Except as provided by Section 21.202, this subchapter does not apply to a teacher employed under a probationary contract in accordance with Subchapter C or a continuing contract in accordance with Subchapter D.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER F. HEARINGS BEFORE HEARING EXAMINERS

Sec. 21.251. APPLICABILITY. (a) This subchapter applies if a teacher requests a hearing after receiving notice of the proposed decision to:

(1) terminate the teacher's continuing contract at any time, except as provided by Subsection (b)(3);

(2) terminate the teacher's probationary or term contract before the end of the contract period, except as provided by Subsection (b)(3); or

(3) suspend the teacher without pay.

(b) This subchapter does not apply to:

(1) a decision to terminate a teacher's employment at the end of a probationary contract;

(2) a decision not to renew a teacher's term contract, unless the board of trustees of the employing district has decided to use the process prescribed by this subchapter for that purpose; or

(3) a decision, on the basis of a financial exigency declared under Section 44.011 that requires a reduction in personnel, to terminate a probationary or term contract before the end of the contract period or to terminate a continuing contract at any time, unless the board of trustees has decided to use the process prescribed by this subchapter for that purpose.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 12, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.252. CERTIFICATION OF HEARING EXAMINERS. (a) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the State Office of Administrative Hearings, by rule shall establish criteria for the certification of hearing examiners eligible to conduct hearings under this subchapter. A hearing examiner certified under this subchapter must be licensed to practice law in this state.

(b) The commissioner shall certify hearing examiners according to the criteria established under Subsection (a). A person certified as a hearing examiner or the law firm with which the person is associated may not serve as an agent or representative of:

(1) a school district;

(2) a teacher in any dispute with a school district; or

(3) an organization of school employees, school administrators, or school boards.

(c) The commissioner shall set hourly rates of compensation for a hearing examiner and shall set a maximum amount of compensation a hearing examiner may receive for a hearing.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.253. REQUEST FOR HEARING. (a) A teacher must file a written request for a hearing under this subchapter with the commissioner not later than the 15th day after the date the teacher receives written notice of the proposed action. The teacher must provide the district with a copy of the request and must provide the commissioner with a copy of the notice.

(b) The parties may agree in writing to extend by not more than 10 days the deadline for requesting a hearing.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 21.254. ASSIGNMENT OF HEARING EXAMINER. (a) The commissioner shall maintain a list of the names of all persons who have been certified as hearing examiners. The list shall be initially prepared in a random order, and subsequent additions to the list shall be added chronologically.

(b) The commissioner shall assign the hearing examiner for a particular case by selecting the next person named on the list who resides within reasonable proximity to the district as determined by the commissioner. The commissioner may not change the order of names once the order is established under this section, except that once each hearing examiner on the list has been assigned to a case, the names shall be randomly reordered.

(c) If a hearing examiner is not selected by the parties to a pending case under Subsection (e), the commissioner shall assign a hearing examiner to the case not earlier than the sixth business day and not later than the 10th business day after the date on which the commissioner receives the request for a hearing. When a hearing examiner has been assigned to a case, the commissioner shall immediately notify the parties.

(d) The parties may agree to reject a hearing examiner for any reason and either party is entitled to reject the assigned hearing examiner for cause. A rejection must be in writing and filed with the commissioner not later than the third day after the date of notification of the hearing examiner's assignment. If the parties agree to reject the hearing examiner or if the commissioner determines that one party has good cause to reject the hearing examiner, the commissioner shall assign another hearing examiner as provided by Subsection (b). If neither party makes a timely rejection, the assignment is final.

(e) After the teacher receives the notice of the proposed action, the parties by agreement may select a hearing examiner from the list maintained by the commissioner under Subsection (a) or a person who is not certified to serve as a hearing examiner. A person who is not a certified hearing examiner may be selected only if the person is licensed to practice law in this state. If the parties agree on a hearing examiner, the parties shall, before the date the commissioner is permitted to assign a hearing examiner, notify the commissioner in writing of the agreement, including the name of the hearing examiner selected.

(f) After the teacher receives the notice of the proposed action, the teacher and the district may agree in writing that the decision of the hearing examiner will be final and nonappealable on all or some issues.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 21.255. HEARINGS BEFORE HEARING EXAMINER. (a) The hearing examiner may issue subpoenas at the request of either party for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents at the hearing and may administer oaths, rule on motions and the admissibility of evidence, maintain decorum by closing the hearing or taking other appropriate action, schedule and recess the proceedings, and make any other orders as provided by rules adopted by the commissioner. The hearing examiner may issue a subpoena for the attendance of a person who is not an employee of the district only if the party requesting the issuance of the subpoena shows good cause for the subpoena. The hearing must be held within the geographical boundaries of the school district or at the regional education service center that serves the district.

(b) A hearing examiner may allow either party to take one or more depositions or to use other means of discovery before the hearing. The hearing examiner, at the request of either party, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents at the deposition. The hearing examiner may issue a subpoena for the deposition of any person who is not an employee of the district only if the party requesting the issuance of the subpoena shows good cause for the subpoena. The deposition must be held within the geographical boundaries of the school district or at the regional education service center that serves the district.

(c) A procedure specified in this section may be changed or eliminated by written agreement of the teacher and the school district after the teacher receives the written notice of the proposed action.

(d) If the hearing examiner is unable to continue presiding over a case at any time before issuing a recommendation or decision, the parties shall request the assignment of another hearing examiner under Section 21.254 who, after a review of the record, shall perform any remaining functions without the necessity of repeating any previous proceedings.

(e) The school district shall bear the cost of the services of the hearing examiner and certified shorthand reporter at the hearing and the production of any original hearing transcript. Each party shall bear its respective costs, including the cost of discovery, if any, and attorney's fees.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.256. CONDUCT OF HEARING. (a) A hearing under this subchapter must be private unless the teacher requests in writing that the hearing be public, except that a hearing examiner may close a hearing if necessary to maintain decorum.

(b) The hearing is not subject to Chapter 2001, Government Code.

(c) At the hearing, a teacher has the right to:

(1) be represented by a representative of the teacher's choice;

(2) hear the evidence on which the charges are based;

(3) cross-examine each adverse witness; and

(4) present evidence.

(d) The Texas Rules of Evidence apply at the hearing. A certified shorthand reporter shall record the hearing.

(e) The hearing shall be conducted in the same manner as a trial without a jury in a district court of this state. The hearing examiner's findings of fact and conclusions of law shall be presumed to be based only on admissible evidence.

(f) To protect the privacy of a witness who is a child, the hearing examiner may:

(1) close the hearing to receive the testimony of the witness; or

(2) order that the testimony or a statement of the witness be presented using the procedures prescribed by Article 38.071, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(g) An evaluation or appraisal of the teacher is presumed to be admissible at the hearing.

(h) At the hearing, the school district has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 5.003, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 21.257. RECOMMENDATION OF HEARING EXAMINER. (a) Not later than the 60th day after the date on which the commissioner receives a teacher's written request for a hearing, the hearing examiner shall complete the hearing and make a written recommendation that:

(1) includes proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law; and

(2) may include a proposal for granting relief.

(a-1) A determination by the hearing examiner regarding good cause for the suspension of a teacher without pay or the termination of a probationary, continuing, or term contract is a conclusion of law and may be adopted, rejected, or changed by the board of trustees or board subcommittee as provided by Section 21.259(b).

(b) The proposed relief under Subsection (a)(2) may include reinstatement, back pay, or employment benefits but may not include attorney's fees or other costs associated with the hearing or appeals from the hearing.

(c) The parties may agree in writing to extend by not more than 45 days the right to a recommendation by the date prescribed by Subsection (a). A hearing under this section may not be held on a Saturday, Sunday, or a state or federal holiday, unless all parties agree.

(d) The hearing examiner shall send a copy of the recommendation to each party, the president of the board of trustees, and the commissioner.

(e) A hearing examiner who fails to timely issue a written recommendation or decision may not be assigned by the commissioner to conduct additional hearings for a period not to exceed one year.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 13, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.258. CONSIDERATION OF RECOMMENDATION BY BOARD OF TRUSTEES OR BOARD SUBCOMMITTEE. (a) The board of trustees or a subcommittee designated by the board shall consider the recommendation and record of the hearing examiner at the first board meeting for which notice can be posted in compliance with Chapter 551, Government Code, following the issuance of the recommendation. The meeting must be held not later than the 20th day after the date that the president of the board receives the hearing examiner's recommendation and the record of the hearing.

(b) At the meeting, the board of trustees or board subcommittee shall consider the hearing examiner's recommendation and shall allow each party to present an oral argument to the board or subcommittee. The board by written policy may limit the amount of time for oral argument. The policy must provide equal time for each party.

(c) The board of trustees or board subcommittee may obtain advice concerning legal matters from an attorney who has not been involved in the proceedings.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.259. DECISION OF BOARD OF TRUSTEES OR BOARD SUBCOMMITTEE. (a) Not later than the 10th day after the date of the board meeting under Section 21.258, the board of trustees or board subcommittee shall announce a decision that:

(1) includes findings of fact and conclusions of law; and

(2) may include a grant of relief.

(b) The board of trustees or board subcommittee may adopt, reject, or change the hearing examiner's:

(1) conclusions of law, including a determination regarding good cause for suspension without pay or termination; or

(2) proposal for granting relief.

(c) The board of trustees or board subcommittee may reject or change a finding of fact made by the hearing examiner only after reviewing the record of the proceedings before the hearing examiner and only if the finding of fact is not supported by substantial evidence.

(d) The board of trustees or board subcommittee shall state in writing the reason and legal basis for a change or rejection made under this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 14, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.260. RECORDING OF BOARD MEETING AND ANNOUNCEMENT. A certified shorthand reporter shall record the oral argument under Section 21.258 and the announcement of the decision under Section 21.259. The school district shall bear the cost of the services of the certified shorthand reporter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER G. APPEALS TO COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION

Sec. 21.301. APPEAL TO COMMISSIONER. (a) Not later than the 20th day after the date the board of trustees or board subcommittee announces its decision under Section 21.259 or the board advises the teacher of its decision not to renew the teacher's contract under Section 21.208, the teacher may appeal the decision by filing a petition for review with the commissioner.

(b) The school district must file a response not later than the 20th day after the date the petition for review is filed. The record of the local hearing must be filed with the district's response or be filed alone within the period for a response if the district does not file a response. A school district's filing of the record with the commissioner under this subsection is not an offense under Section 551.146, Government Code.

(c) The commissioner shall review the record of the hearing before the hearing examiner and the oral argument before the board of trustees or board subcommittee. Except as provided in Section 21.302, the commissioner shall consider the appeal solely on the basis of the local record and may not consider any additional evidence or issue. The commissioner, on the motion of a party or on the commissioner's motion, may hear oral argument. The commissioner shall accept written argument.

(d) In conducting a hearing under this section, the commissioner has the same authority relating to discovery and conduct of a hearing as a hearing examiner has under Subchapter F.

(e) The commissioner may adopt rules governing the conduct of an appeal to the commissioner. An appeal to the commissioner under this section is not subject to Chapter 2001, Government Code.

(f) The commissioner may obtain advice concerning legal matters from the chief legal officer of the agency if the chief legal officer has not been involved in the proceedings.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 895, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2001.

Sec. 21.302. EVIDENTIARY HEARING BEFORE COMMISSIONER. (a) If a party alleges that procedural irregularities that are not reflected in the local record occurred at the hearing before the hearing examiner, the commissioner may hold a hearing for the presentation of evidence on that issue. The party alleging that procedural irregularities occurred shall identify the specific alleged defect and its claimed effect on the board's or board subcommittee's decision. The commissioner may make appropriate orders consistent with rules adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner's determination on any alleged procedural irregularities is final and may not be appealed.

(b) A hearing under this section shall be recorded by a certified shorthand reporter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.303. DETERMINATION BY COMMISSIONER. (a) If the board of trustees decided not to renew a teacher's term contract, the commissioner may not substitute the commissioner's judgment for that of the board of trustees unless the decision was arbitrary, capricious, or unlawful or is not supported by substantial evidence.

(b) If the board of trustees terminated a teacher's probationary, continuing, or term contract during the contract term or suspended a teacher without pay, the commissioner may not substitute the commissioner's judgment for that of the board unless:

(1) if the board accepted the hearing examiner's findings of fact without modification, the decision is arbitrary, capricious, or unlawful or is not supported by substantial evidence; or

(2) if the board modified the hearing examiner's findings of fact, the decision is arbitrary, capricious, or unlawful or the hearing examiner's original findings of fact are not supported by substantial evidence.

(c) The commissioner may not reverse a decision of a board of trustees based on a procedural irregularity or error by a hearing examiner, the board of trustees, or a board subcommittee unless the commissioner determines that the irregularity or error was likely to have led to an erroneous decision by the board or board subcommittee.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.304. DECISION OF COMMISSIONER. (a) The commissioner's decision must be in writing and must include findings of fact and conclusions of law. The commissioner may adopt by reference and incorporate findings of fact or conclusions of law from the local record.

(b) The commissioner must issue a decision not later than the 30th day after the last day on which a response to the petition for review may be filed under Section 21.301(b). If the commissioner fails to issue a decision within that time, the decision of the board is affirmed.

(c) The commissioner shall send a copy of the decision to each party or the party's representative by certified mail. The commissioner shall keep a record of the mailing. A party is presumed to be notified of the decision on the date the decision is received, as indicated by the certified mail return receipt.

(d) The commissioner shall maintain and index decisions of the commissioner issued under this section with the recommendations or decisions of the hearing examiner.

(e) If the commissioner reverses the action of the board of trustees, the commissioner shall order the school district to reinstate the teacher and to pay the teacher any back pay and employment benefits from the time of discharge or suspension to reinstatement.

(f) Instead of reinstating a teacher under Subsection (e), the school district may pay the teacher one year's salary to which the teacher would have been entitled from the date on which the teacher would have been reinstated.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.3041. REHEARING BY COMMISSIONER. (a) Not later than the 20th day after the date the party or the party's representative receives notice of the commissioner's decision under Section 21.304, the party may file a request for rehearing.

(b) A request for rehearing is not required for a party to appeal the commissioner's decision under Section 21.307.

(c) A request for rehearing is denied by operation of law if the commissioner does not issue an order before the 45th day after the date the party or the party's representative receives notice of the commissioner's decision.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 21.305. COSTS ON APPEAL TO COMMISSIONER. (a) If a teacher appeals the decision of the board of trustees or board subcommittee, the school district shall bear the cost of preparing the original transcripts of:

(1) the hearing before the hearing examiner; and

(2) the oral argument before the board of trustees or board subcommittee.

(b) Each party shall bear the cost of any copy of the transcript requested by that party.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.306. EX PARTE COMMUNICATIONS PROHIBITED. The commissioner and the staff of the agency may not communicate with any party or any party's representative in connection with any issue of fact or law except on notice and opportunity for each party to participate.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.307. JUDICIAL APPEALS. (a) Either party may appeal the commissioner's decision to:

(1) a district court in the county in which the district's central administrative offices are located; or

(2) if agreed by all parties, a district court in Travis County.

(b) An appeal under this section must be perfected not later than the 30th day after:

(1) the date the party or the party's representative receives notice of the commissioner's decision or the date on which the decision of the board of trustees is affirmed by operation of law if the commissioner fails to issue a decision within the required period; or

(2) if a request for rehearing is filed under Section 21.3041, the date on which the request is denied by order of the commissioner or by operation of law under Section 21.3041(c).

(c) The commissioner and each party to the appeal to the commissioner must be made a party to an appeal under this section.

(d) The perfection of an appeal under this section does not affect the enforcement of the commissioner's decision.

(e) The court shall, under the substantial evidence rule, review the evidence on the evidentiary record made at the local level and any evidence taken by the commissioner but may not take additional evidence.

(f) The court may not reverse the decision of the commissioner unless the decision was not supported by substantial evidence or unless the commissioner's conclusions of law are erroneous.

(g) The court may not reverse a decision of the commissioner based on a procedural irregularity or error by a hearing examiner, a board of trustees or board subcommittee, or the commissioner unless the court determines that the irregularity or error was likely to have led to an erroneous decision by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 5, eff. June 20, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER H. APPRAISALS AND INCENTIVES

Sec. 21.351. RECOMMENDED APPRAISAL PROCESS AND PERFORMANCE CRITERIA. (a) The commissioner shall adopt a recommended appraisal process and criteria on which to appraise the performance of teachers. The criteria must be based on observable, job-related behavior, including:

(1) teachers' implementation of discipline management procedures; and

(2) the performance of teachers' students.

(a-1) In adopting criteria described by Subsection (a)(1), the commissioner shall ensure that a teacher may not be assigned an area of deficiency in an appraisal solely on the basis of disciplinary referrals made by the teacher or documentation regarding student conduct submitted by the teacher under Section 37.002. This subsection does not prohibit a teacher from being assigned an area of deficiency based on documented evidence of a deficiency in classroom management obtained through observation or a substantiated report.

(b) The commissioner shall solicit and consider the advice of teachers in developing the recommended appraisal process and performance criteria.

(c) Under the recommended appraisal process, an appraiser must be the teacher's supervisor or a person approved by the board of trustees. An appraiser who is a classroom teacher may not appraise the performance of another classroom teacher who teaches at the same school campus at which the appraiser teaches, unless it is impractical because of the number of campuses or unless the appraiser is the chair of a department or grade level whose job description includes classroom observation responsibilities.

(d) Under the recommended appraisal process, appraisal for teachers must be detailed by category of professional skill and characteristic and must provide for separate ratings for each category. The appraisal process shall guarantee a conference between the teacher and the appraiser. The conference shall be diagnostic and prescriptive with regard to remediation needed in overall performance and by category.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1451), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 21.352. LOCAL ROLE. (a) In appraising teachers, each school district shall use:

(1) the appraisal process and performance criteria developed by the commissioner; or

(2) an appraisal process and performance criteria:

(A) developed by the district- and campus-level committees established under Section 11.251;

(B) containing the items described by Sections 21.351(a)(1) and (2); and

(C) adopted by the board of trustees.

(a-1) A school district may not assign an area of deficiency to a teacher solely on the basis of disciplinary referrals made by the teacher or documentation regarding student conduct submitted by the teacher under Section 37.002. This subsection does not prohibit a teacher from being assigned an area of deficiency based on documented evidence of a deficiency in classroom management obtained through observation or a substantiated report.

(b) The board of trustees may reject an appraisal process and performance criteria developed by the district- and campus-level committees but may not modify the process or criteria.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, appraisal must be done at least once for each school year. A teacher may be appraised less frequently if the teacher agrees in writing and the teacher's most recent evaluation rated the teacher as at least proficient, or the equivalent, and did not identify any area of deficiency. A teacher who is appraised less frequently than annually must be appraised at least once during each period of five school years. The district shall maintain a written copy of the evaluation of each teacher's performance in the teacher's personnel file. Each teacher is entitled to receive a written copy of the evaluation promptly on its completion. After receiving a written copy of the evaluation, a teacher is entitled to a second appraisal by a different appraiser or to submit a written rebuttal to the evaluation to be attached to the evaluation in the teacher's personnel file. The evaluation and any rebuttal may be given to another school district at which the teacher has applied for employment at the request of that district.

(c-1) In addition to conducting a complete appraisal as frequently as required by Subsection (c), a school district shall require that appropriate components of the appraisal process, such as classroom observations and walk-throughs, occur more frequently as necessary to ensure that a teacher receives adequate evaluation and guidance. A school district shall give priority to conducting appropriate components more frequently for inexperienced teachers or experienced teachers with identified areas of deficiency.

(d) A teacher may be given advance notice of the date or time of an appraisal, but advance notice is not required.

(e) A district shall use a teacher's consecutive appraisals from more than one year, if available, in making the district's employment decisions and developing career recommendations for the teacher.

(f) The district shall notify a teacher of the results of any appraisal of the teacher in a timely manner so that the appraisal may be used as a developmental tool by the district and the teacher to improve the overall performance of the teacher.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 244, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1282 (H.B. 2012), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1451), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.007, eff. June 12, 2019.

Sec. 21.3521. LOCAL OPTIONAL TEACHER DESIGNATION SYSTEM. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), a school district or open-enrollment charter school may designate a classroom teacher as a master, exemplary, or recognized teacher for a five-year period based on the results from single year or multiyear appraisals that comply with Section 21.351 or 21.352.

(b) The commissioner shall establish performance and validity standards for each local optional teacher designation system. The performance standards:

(1) must provide a mathematical possibility that all teachers eligible for a designation may earn the designation; and

(2) may not require a district to use an assessment instrument adopted under Section 39.023 to evaluate teacher performance.

(c) Notwithstanding performance standards established under Subsection (b), a classroom teacher that holds a National Board Certification issued by the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards may be designated as recognized.

(d) The commissioner shall:

(1) ensure that local optional teacher designation systems:

(A) meet the requirements of this section; and

(B) prioritize high needs campuses; and

(2) enter into a memorandum of understanding with Texas Tech University to monitor the quality and fairness of local optional teacher designation systems.

(e) The agency shall develop and provide technical assistance for school districts and open-enrollment charter schools that request assistance in implementing a local optional teacher designation system, including assistance in prioritizing high needs campuses.

(f) A teacher has no vested property right in a teacher designation assigned to the teacher under this section. A teacher designation issued under this section is void in the determination that the designation was issued improperly. Subchapters C through H, Chapter 2001, Government Code, do not apply to the voiding of a teacher designation under this subsection.

(g) The agency shall periodically conduct evaluations of the effectiveness of the local optional teacher designation systems under this section and the teacher incentive allotment under Section 48.112 and report the results of the evaluations to the legislature. A school district or open-enrollment charter school that has implemented a local optional teacher designation system or received funds under the teacher incentive allotment shall participate in the evaluations.

(h) The agency shall collect information necessary to implement this section. Information otherwise confidential remains confidential and is not subject to Chapter 552, Government Code.

(i) The commissioner may adopt fees to implement this section. A fee adopted by the agency under this section is not subject to Sections 2001.0045 and 2001.0221, Government Code.

(j) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section. A decision made by the commissioner under this section is final and may not be appealed.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.008, eff. June 12, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 806 (H.B. 1525), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.353. APPRAISAL ON BASIS OF CLASSROOM TEACHING PERFORMANCE. A teacher who directs extracurricular activities in addition to performing classroom teaching duties shall be appraised only on the basis of classroom teaching performance and not on performance in connection with the extracurricular activities.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.354. APPRAISAL OF CERTAIN ADMINISTRATORS. (a) The commissioner shall adopt a recommended appraisal process and criteria on which to appraise the performance of various classifications of school administrators. The criteria must be based on job-related performance.

(a-1) This section does not apply to the appraisal of the performance of a principal.

(b) The commissioner may solicit and consider the advice of teachers and administrators in developing the appraisal process and performance criteria.

(c) Each school district shall appraise each administrator annually using either:

(1) the commissioner's recommended appraisal process and performance criteria; or

(2) an appraisal process and performance criteria:

(A) developed by the district in consultation with the district- and campus-level committees established under Section 11.251; and

(B) adopted by the board of trustees.

(d) Funds of a school district may not be used to pay an administrator who has not been appraised under this section in the preceding 15 months.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093, Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 21, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (S.B. 1383), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (S.B. 1383), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (S.B. 1383), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 21.3541. APPRAISAL AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT SYSTEM FOR PRINCIPALS. (a) The commissioner by rule shall establish and shall administer a comprehensive appraisal and professional development system for principals.

(b) The commissioner may establish a consortium of nationally recognized experts on educational leadership and policy to:

(1) assist the commissioner in effectively researching and developing the comprehensive appraisal and professional development system described by Subsection (a); and

(2) evaluate relevant research and practices and make recommendations to the commissioner to improve the quality of the training, appraisal, professional development, and compensation of principals.

(c) If the commissioner establishes the consortium, the commissioner shall select a presiding officer of the consortium. The presiding officer:

(1) must be an expert on educational leadership and policy;

(2) must have a demonstrated ability to lead a statewide school leadership reform initiative; and

(3) may not be employed by a school district in this state.

(d) The commissioner shall establish school leadership standards and a set of indicators of successful school leadership to align with the training, appraisal, and professional development of principals.

(e) In carrying out the commissioner's powers and duties under this section, the commissioner may use only money available from private sources that may be used for that purpose.

(f) In appraising principals, each school district shall use either:

(1) the appraisal system and school leadership standards and indicators developed or established by the commissioner under this section; or

(2) an appraisal process and performance criteria:

(A) developed by the district in consultation with the district-level and campus-level committees established under Section 11.251; and

(B) adopted by the board of trustees.

(g) Each school district shall appraise each principal annually.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (S.B. 1383), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 21.355. CONFIDENTIALITY. (a) A document evaluating the performance of a teacher or administrator is confidential and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(b) Subsection (a) applies to a teacher or administrator employed by an open-enrollment charter school regardless of whether the teacher or administrator is certified under Subchapter B.

(c) At the request of a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school at which a teacher or administrator has applied for employment, a school district or an open-enrollment charter school shall give the requesting district or school a document evaluating the performance of a teacher or administrator employed by the school.

(d) A school district or open-enrollment charter school shall give the agency a document evaluating the performance of a teacher or administrator employed by the district or school for purposes of an investigation conducted by the agency.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (a) and except as otherwise provided by a court order prohibiting disclosure, a document provided to the agency under Subsection (d) may be used in a disciplinary proceeding against a teacher or administrator if the document may be admitted under rules of evidence applicable to a contested case, as provided by Section 2001.081, Government Code.

(f) A document provided to the agency under Subsection (d) remains confidential unless the document becomes part of the record in a contested case under Chapter 2001, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1305 (H.B. 2971), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 986 (S.B. 1230), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.356. EVALUATION OF SCHOOL COUNSELORS. The commissioner shall develop and periodically update a job description and an evaluation form for use by school districts in evaluating school counselors. The commissioner shall consult with state guidance counselor associations in the development and modification of the job description and the evaluation form.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.357. PERFORMANCE INCENTIVES. (a) The commissioner shall design an objective system to evaluate principals that:

(1) is based on types of information available as of January 1, 1995, through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) and the state's public school accountability system;

(2) focuses on gain at a principal's campus and includes a statistical analysis comparing current campus performance to previous performance; and

(3) does not include subjective items.

(b) From funds appropriated for that purpose, the commissioner may award performance incentives to principals identified through the evaluation system as high-performing. Based on available appropriations, for each fiscal year, a performance incentive may not exceed:

(1) $5,000, for a principal ranked in the top quartile; or

(2) $2,500, for a principal ranked in the second quartile.

(c) A performance incentive awarded to a principal under this section must be distributed to the principal's school and used in the manner determined by the campus-level committee established under Section 11.253 in accordance with the requirements of Section 39.264(a).

(d) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(8), eff. June 17, 2011.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 824, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 22, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(8), eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER I. DUTIES AND BENEFITS

Sec. 21.401. MINIMUM SERVICE REQUIRED. (a) A contract between a school district and an educator must be for a minimum of 10 months' service.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c-1), an educator employed under a 10-month contract must provide a minimum of 187 days of service.

(c) The commissioner, as provided by Section 25.081(b), may reduce the number of days of service required by this section. A reduction by the commissioner does not reduce an educator's salary.

(c-1) If a school district anticipates providing less than 180 days of instruction for students during a school year, as indicated by the district's academic calendar, the district may reduce the number of days of service required by this section proportionately. A reduction by the district does not reduce an educator's salary.

(d) Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to a contract between a school district and an educational diagnostician.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 592, Sec. 1.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 949, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 1.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 158), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 673 (S.B. 2073), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 21.402. MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE FOR CERTAIN PROFESSIONAL STAFF. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (e-1) or (f), a school district must pay each classroom teacher, full-time librarian, full-time school counselor certified under Subchapter B, or full-time school nurse not less than the minimum monthly salary, based on the employee's level of experience in addition to other factors, as determined by commissioner rule, determined by the following formula:

MS = SF x FS

where:

"MS" is the minimum monthly salary;

"SF" is the applicable salary factor specified by Subsection (c); and

"FS" is the amount, as determined by the commissioner under Subsection (b), of the basic allotment as provided by Section 48.051(a) or (b) for a school district with a maintenance and operations tax rate at least equal to the state maximum compressed tax rate, as defined by Section 48.051(a).

(b) Not later than June 1 of each year, the commissioner shall determine the basic allotment and resulting monthly salaries to be paid by school districts as provided by Subsection (a).

(c) The salary factors per step are as follows:

Years Experience 0 1 2 3 4

Salary Factor .5464 .5582 .5698 .5816 .6064

Years Experience 5 6 7 8 9

Salary Factor .6312 .6560 .6790 .7008 .7214

Years Experience 10 11 12 13 14

Salary Factor .7408 .7592 .7768 .7930 .8086

Years Experience 15 16 17 18 19

Salary Factor .8232 .8372 .8502 .8626 .8744

Years Experience 20 and over

Salary Factor .8854

(c-1) Notwithstanding Subsections (a) and (b), each school district shall pay a monthly salary to each classroom teacher, full-time speech pathologist, full-time librarian, full-time school counselor certified under Subchapter B, and full-time school nurse that is at least equal to the following monthly salary or the monthly salary determined by the commissioner under Subsections (a) and (b), whichever is greater:

Years of Monthly

Experience Salary

0 2,732

1 2,791

2 2,849

3 2,908

4 3,032

5 3,156

6 3,280

7 3,395

8 3,504

9 3,607

10 3,704

11 3,796

12 3,884

13 3,965

14 4,043

15 4,116

16 4,186

17 4,251

18 4,313

19 4,372

20 & Over 4,427

(c-2) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4, Sec. 57.31(1), eff. September 28, 2011.

(c-3) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4, Sec. 57.31(1), eff. September 28, 2011.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8, Sec. 21(2), eff. September 28, 2011.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4, Sec. 57.31(1), eff. September 28, 2011.

(e-1) If the minimum monthly salary determined under Subsection (a) for a particular level of experience is less than the minimum monthly salary for that level of experience in the preceding year, the minimum monthly salary is the minimum monthly salary for the preceding year.

(f) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), a teacher or librarian who received a career ladder supplement on August 31, 1993, is entitled to at least the same gross monthly salary the teacher or librarian received for the 1994-1995 school year as long as the teacher or librarian is employed by the same district.

(g) The commissioner may adopt rules to govern the application of this section, including rules that:

(1) require the payment of a minimum salary under this section to a person employed in more than one capacity for which a minimum salary is provided and whose combined employment in those capacities constitutes full-time employment; and

(2) specify the credentials a person must hold to be considered a speech pathologist or school nurse under this section.

(h) In this section, "gross monthly salary" must include the amount a teacher or librarian received that represented a career ladder salary supplement under Section 16.057, as that section existed January 1, 1993.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 592, Sec. 1.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 1.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1156, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.05, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 57.04, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 57.05, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 57.31(1), eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 15, eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 21(2), eff. September 28, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 11, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 12, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 13, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.014, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.4021. FURLOUGHS. (a) Notwithstanding Section 21.401 and subject to Section 21.4022, the board of trustees of a school district may, in accordance with district policy, implement a furlough program and reduce the number of days of service otherwise required under Section 21.401 by not more than six days of service during a school year if the commissioner certifies in accordance with Section 48.010 that the district will be provided with less state and local funding for that year than was provided to the district for the 2010-2011 school year.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21.402, the board of trustees may reduce the salary of an employee who is furloughed in proportion to the number of days by which service is reduced, provided that the furlough program is implemented in compliance with this section.

(b-1) A furlough program must subject all contract personnel to the same number of furlough days.

(c) An educator may not be furloughed on a day that is included in the number of days of instruction required under Section 25.081.

(d) An educator may not use personal, sick, or any other paid leave while the educator is on a furlough.

(e) A furlough imposed under this section does not constitute a break in service for purposes of the Teacher Retirement System of Texas. A furlough day does not constitute a day of service for purposes of the Teacher Retirement System of Texas.

(f) Implementation of a furlough program may not result in an increase in the number of required teacher workdays.

(g) If a board of trustees adopts a furlough program after the date by which a teacher must give notice of resignation under Section 21.105, 21.160, or 21.210, as applicable, a teacher who subsequently resigns is not subject to sanctions imposed by the State Board for Educator Certification as otherwise authorized by those sections.

(h) A decision by the board of trustees to implement a furlough program:

(1) is final and may not be appealed; and

(2) does not create a cause of action or require collective bargaining.

(i) Any reduction under this section in the amount of the annual salary paid to an employee must be equally distributed over the course of the employee's current contract with the school district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 16, eff. September 28, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.015, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.4022. REQUIRED PROCESS FOR DEVELOPMENT OF FURLOUGH PROGRAM OR OTHER SALARY REDUCTION PROPOSAL. (a) The board of trustees of a school district may not implement a furlough program under Section 21.4021 or reduce salaries until the district has complied with this section.

(b) A school district must use a process to develop a furlough program or other salary reduction proposal, as applicable, that:

(1) includes the involvement of the district's professional staff; and

(2) provides district employees with the opportunity to express opinions regarding the furlough program or salary reduction proposal, as applicable, at the public meeting required by Subsection (c).

(c) The board of trustees must hold a public meeting at which the board and school district administration present:

(1) information regarding the options considered for managing the district's available resources, including consideration of a tax rate increase and use of the district's available fund balance;

(2) an explanation of how the district intends, through implementation of a furlough program under Section 21.4021 or through other salary reductions, as applicable, to limit the number of district employees who will be discharged or whose contracts will not be renewed; and

(3) information regarding the local option residence homestead exemption.

(d) Any explanation of a furlough program under Subsection (c)(2) must state the specific number of furlough days proposed to be required.

(e) The public and school district employees must be provided with an opportunity to comment at the public meeting required under Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 16, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.403. PLACEMENT ON MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE. (a) A teacher, librarian, school counselor, or nurse shall advance one step on the minimum salary schedule under Section 21.402 for each year of experience as a teacher, librarian, school counselor, or nurse until step 20 is reached.

(b) For each year of work experience required for certification in a career or technological field, up to a maximum of two years, a certified career or technology education teacher is entitled to salary step credit as if the work experience were teaching experience.

(c) The commissioner shall adopt rules for determining the experience for which a teacher, librarian, school counselor, or nurse is to be given credit in placing the teacher, librarian, school counselor, or nurse on the minimum salary schedule. A district shall credit the teacher, librarian, school counselor, or nurse for each year of experience without regard to whether the years are consecutive.

(d) As long as a teacher or librarian who received a career ladder supplement is employed by the same school district, the teacher or librarian is entitled to:

(1) placement on the minimum salary schedule at the step above the step on which the teacher would otherwise be placed, if the teacher or librarian received a career ladder supplement for level two of the career ladder on August 31, 1993; or

(2) placement on the minimum salary schedule at the step two steps above the step on which the teacher would otherwise be placed, if the teacher or librarian received a career ladder supplement for level three of the career ladder on August 31, 1993.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 921, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 1.31, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 14, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.4031. PROFESSIONAL STAFF SERVICE RECORDS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Salary schedule" means the minimum salary schedule under Section 21.402 or a comparable salary schedule used by a school district that specifies salary amounts based on an employee's level of experience.

(2) "Service record" means a school district document that indicates the total years of service provided to the district by a classroom teacher, librarian, school counselor, or nurse.

(b) On request by a classroom teacher, librarian, school counselor, or nurse or by the school district employing one of those individuals, a school district that previously employed the individual shall provide a copy of the individual's service record to the school district employing the individual. The district must provide the copy not later than the 30th day after the later of:

(1) the date the request is made; or

(2) the date of the last day of the individual's service to the district.

(c) If a school district fails to provide an individual's service record as required by Subsection (b), the agency shall, to the extent that information is available to the agency, provide the employing school district with information sufficient to enable the district to determine proper placement of the individual on the district's salary schedule.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 370 (H.B. 1365), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 15, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 16, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.4032. REDUCTIONS IN SALARIES OF CLASSROOM TEACHERS AND ADMINISTRATORS. (a) This section applies only to a widespread reduction in the amount of the annual salaries paid to school district classroom teachers based primarily on district financial conditions rather than on teacher performance.

(b) For any school year in which a school district has reduced the amount of the annual salaries paid to district classroom teachers from the amount paid for the preceding school year, the district shall reduce the amount of the annual salary paid to each district administrator or other professional employee by a percent or fraction of a percent that is equal to the average percent or fraction of a percent by which teacher salaries have been reduced.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 16, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 21.404. PLANNING AND PREPARATION TIME. Each classroom teacher is entitled to at least 450 minutes within each two-week period for instructional preparation, including parent-teacher conferences, evaluating students' work, and planning. A planning and preparation period under this section may not be less than 45 minutes within the instructional day. During a planning and preparation period, a classroom teacher may not be required to participate in any other activity.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.4045. PLANNING AND NONINSTRUCTIONAL DUTIES OF TEACHERS. (a) A school district may enter into a supplemental agreement with a classroom teacher under which the teacher agrees to perform a duty relating to initial lesson plan design or instructional material selection that is not a duty generally:

(1) anticipated to be performed during the instructional day; and

(2) assigned to all classroom teachers of the same subject and grade level under those teachers' employment contracts.

(b) A school district may not require a classroom teacher for a foundation curriculum course to spend planning and preparation time to which the teacher is entitled under Section 21.404 creating or selecting instructional materials to initially cover the applicable essential knowledge and skills for the course unless the teacher has entered into a supplemental agreement described by Subsection (a). This subsection may not be construed to prohibit a classroom teacher from choosing to spend the teacher's planning and preparation time creating or selecting instructional materials.

(c) A supplemental agreement between a school district and a classroom teacher described by Subsection (a) under which a teacher is assigned responsibility for a greater number of duties unrelated to providing instruction than other full-time teachers of the same grade level in the district must explicitly state each of the teacher's duties unrelated to providing instruction.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 1605), Sec. 3, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 21.405. DUTY-FREE LUNCH. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), each classroom teacher or full-time librarian is entitled to at least a 30-minute lunch period free from all duties and responsibilities connected with the instruction and supervision of students. Each school district may set flexible or rotating schedules for each classroom teacher or full-time librarian in the district for the implementation of the duty-free lunch period.

(b) The implementation of this section may not result in a lengthened school day.

(c) If necessary because of a personnel shortage, extreme economic conditions, or an unavoidable or unforeseen circumstance, a school district may require a classroom teacher or librarian entitled to a duty-free lunch to supervise students during lunch. A classroom teacher or librarian may not be required to supervise students under this subsection more than one day in any school week. The commissioner by rule shall prescribe guidelines for determining what constitutes a personnel shortage, extreme economic conditions, or an unavoidable or unforeseen circumstance for purposes of this subsection.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.406. DENIAL OF COMPENSATION BASED ON ABSENCE FOR RELIGIOUS OBSERVANCE PROHIBITED. A school district may not deny an educator a salary bonus or similar compensation given in whole or in part on the basis of educator attendance because of the educator's absence from school for observance of a holy day observed by a religion whose places of worship are exempt from property taxation under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.407. REQUIRING OR COERCING TEACHERS TO JOIN GROUPS, CLUBS, COMMITTEES, OR ORGANIZATIONS: POLITICAL AFFAIRS. (a) A school district board of trustees or school district employee may not directly or indirectly require or coerce any teacher to join any group, club, committee, organization, or association.

(b) A school district board of trustees or school district employee may not directly or indirectly coerce any teacher to refrain from participating in political affairs in the teacher's community, state, or nation.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.408. RIGHT TO JOIN OR NOT TO JOIN PROFESSIONAL ASSOCIATION. This chapter does not abridge the right of an educator to join any professional association or organization or refuse to join any professional association or organization.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.409. LEAVE OF ABSENCE FOR TEMPORARY DISABILITY. (a) Each full-time educator employed by a school district shall be given a leave of absence for temporary disability at any time the educator's condition interferes with the performance of regular duties. The contract or employment of the educator may not be terminated by the school district while the educator is on a leave of absence for temporary disability. "Temporary disability" in this section includes the condition of pregnancy.

(b) A request for a leave of absence for temporary disability must be made to the superintendent of the school district. The request must be accompanied by a physician's statement confirming inability to work and must state the date requested by the educator for the leave to begin and the probable date of return as certified by the physician.

(c) The board of trustees of a school district may adopt a policy providing for placing an educator on leave of absence for temporary disability if, in the board's judgment and in consultation with a physician who has performed a thorough medical examination of the educator, the educator's condition interferes with the performance of regular duties. A policy adopted under this subsection must reserve to the educator the right to present to the board testimony or other information relevant to the educator's fitness to continue the performance of regular duties.

(d) The educator must notify the superintendent of the desire to return to active duty not later than the 30th day before the expected date of return. The notice must be accompanied by a physician's statement indicating the educator's physical fitness for the resumption of regular duties.

(e) An educator returning to active duty after a leave of absence for temporary disability is entitled to an assignment at the school where the educator formerly taught, subject to the availability of an appropriate teaching position. In any event, the educator must be placed on active duty not later than the beginning of the next term.

(f) The length of a leave of absence for temporary disability shall be granted by the superintendent as required by the individual educator. The board of trustees of a school district may establish a maximum length for a leave of absence for temporary disability, but the maximum length may not be less than 180 days.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.414. CLASSROOM SUPPLY REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM. (a) The commissioner shall establish a reimbursement program under which the commissioner provides funds to a school district for the purpose of reimbursing classroom teachers in the district who expend personal funds on classroom supplies. A school district must match any funds provided to the district under the reimbursement program with local funds to be used for the same purpose.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules for the local allocation of funds provided to a school district under the reimbursement program. A school district shall allow each classroom teacher in the district who is reimbursed under the reimbursement program to use the funds in the teacher's discretion, except that the funds must be used for the benefit of the district's students. A school district may not use funds received under the reimbursement program to replace local funds used by the district for the same purpose.

(c) The commissioner shall identify state and federal funds available for use under the reimbursement program, including funds subject to the Education Flexibility Partnership Act of 1999 (20 U.S.C. Section 5891a et seq.), and its subsequent amendments, as well as consolidated administrative funds.

(d) The commissioner shall establish the reimbursement program for implementation beginning not later than the 2005-2006 school year. The commissioner may implement the reimbursement program only if funds are specifically appropriated by the legislature for the program or if the commissioner identifies available funds, other than general revenue funds, that may be used for the program.

(e) Expired.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 263, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2003.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 21.413 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(12), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 21.415. EMPLOYMENT CONTRACTS. (a) A school district shall provide in employment contracts that qualifying employees may receive an incentive payment under an awards program established under Subchapter O if the district participates in the program.

(b) The district shall indicate that any incentive payment distributed is considered a payment for performance and not an entitlement as part of an employee's salary.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.06, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER J. STAFF DEVELOPMENT

Sec. 21.451. STAFF DEVELOPMENT REQUIREMENTS. (a) The staff development provided by a school district to an educator other than a principal must be:

(1) conducted in accordance with standards developed by the district; and

(2) designed to improve education in the district.

(a-1) Section 21.3541 and rules adopted under that section govern the professional development provided to a principal.

(a-2) In designing the staff development described by Subsection (a), a school district must use procedures that, to the greatest extent possible, ensure the training included in the staff development:

(1) incorporates proactive instructional planning techniques using a framework that:

(A) provides flexibility in the ways:

(i) information is presented;

(ii) students respond or demonstrate knowledge and skills; and

(iii) students are engaged;

(B) reduces barriers in instruction;

(C) provides appropriate accommodations, supports, and challenges; and

(D) maintains high achievement expectations for all students, including students with disabilities and students of limited English proficiency; and

(2) integrates inclusive and evidence-based instructional practices for all students, including students with disabilities.

(b) The staff development described by Subsection (a) must be predominantly campus-based, related to achieving campus performance objectives established under Section 11.253, and developed and approved by the campus-level committee established under Section 11.251.

(c) For staff development under Subsection (a), a school district may use district-wide staff development developed and approved through the district-level decision process under Section 11.251.

(d) The staff development:

(1) may include training in:

(A) technology and digital learning; and

(B) positive behavior intervention and support strategies, including classroom management, district discipline policies, and the student code of conduct adopted under Chapter 37;

(2) subject to Subsection (e) and to Section 21.3541 and rules adopted under that section, must include training that is evidence-based, as defined by Section 8101, Every Student Succeeds Act (20 U.S.C. Section 7801), and that:

(A) relates to instruction of students with disabilities, including students with disabilities who also have other intellectual or mental health conditions; and

(B) is designed for educators who work primarily outside the area of special education; and

(3) must include training on:

(A) suicide prevention;

(B) strategies for establishing and maintaining positive relationships among students, including conflict resolution; and

(C) preventing, identifying, responding to, and reporting incidents of bullying.

(d-1) The training required by Subsection (d)(3):

(1) must:

(A) be provided in accordance with the policy adopted under Section 21.4515; and

(B) use a best practice-based program recommended by the Health and Human Services Commission in coordination with the agency under Section 38.351; and

(2) may include two or more listed topics together.

(d-2) The suicide prevention training required by Subsection (d)(3) may be satisfied through independent review of suicide prevention training material that:

(1) complies with the guidelines developed by the agency; and

(2) is offered online.

(d-3) The technology and digital learning training provided by Subsection (d)(1)(A) must:

(1) discuss basic technology proficiency expectations and methods to increase an educator's digital literacy; and

(2) assist an educator in the use of digital technology in learning activities that improve teaching, assessment, and instructional practices.

(e) A school district is required to provide the training described by Subsection (d)(2) to an educator who works primarily outside the area of special education only if the educator does not possess the knowledge and skills necessary to implement the individualized education program developed for a student receiving instruction from the educator. A district may determine the time and place at which the training is delivered.

(f) In developing or maintaining the training required by Subsection (d)(2), a school district must consult with persons with expertise in research-based practices for students with disabilities. Persons who may be consulted under this subsection include colleges, universities, private and nonprofit organizations, regional education service centers, qualified district personnel, and any other persons identified as qualified by the district. This subsection applies to all training required by Subsection (d)(2), regardless of whether the training is provided at the campus or district level.

(g) The staff development may include instruction as to what is permissible under law, including opinions of the United States Supreme Court, regarding prayer in public school.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 766, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 495, Sec. 1.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 740 (S.B. 451), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 776 (H.B. 1942), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (S.B. 1383), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1064 (H.B. 2186), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 757 (S.B. 1839), Sec. 10, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.05, eff. December 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 215 (H.B. 159), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 5.005, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 21.4511. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES FOR TEACHERS AND ADMINISTRATORS. (a) From funds appropriated for that purpose in an amount not to exceed $2.5 million each year, the commissioner may develop and award grants to school districts, regional education service centers, nonprofit organizations, and institutions of higher education for establishing and providing technical assistance and professional development activities in the staff development training of public school teachers and administrators.

(b) The training under this section shall include training relating to implementing curriculum and instruction that is aligned with the foundation curriculum described by Section 28.002(a)(1) and standards and expectations for college readiness, as determined by State Board of Education rule under Section 28.008(d).

(c) The commissioner may give preference to a school district, regional education service center, or institution of higher education conducting professional development activities under this section that applies for a grant in partnership with a state or national organization that has demonstrated success in the development and implementation of high school reform strategies.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 21.4513. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT REQUIREMENTS AUDIT. (a) Using only available funds and resources from public or private sources, the agency shall periodically conduct an audit of the professional development requirements applicable to educators in this state, including state and federal requirements and requirements imposed by school districts.

(b) Based on audit results, the agency shall seek to eliminate conflicting requirements and consolidate duplicative requirements through the following methods, as appropriate:

(1) taking administrative action;

(2) encouraging school districts to make appropriate changes to district policies; or

(3) recommending statutory changes to the legislature.

(c) The agency shall provide guidance to school districts regarding high-quality professional development and the outcomes expected to result from providing that caliber of professional development.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1282 (H.B. 2012), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 21.4514. CONTINUING EDUCATION AND TRAINING CLEARINGHOUSE; ADVISORY GROUP. (a) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the State Board for Educator Certification.

(2) "Clearinghouse advisory group" means the clearinghouse advisory group established under Subsection (d).

(b) The board shall publish a comprehensive clearinghouse of information regarding continuing education and training requirements for:

(1) educators; and

(2) other school personnel.

(c) The clearinghouse must:

(1) include best practices and industry recommendations for the frequency for training of educators and other school personnel; and

(2) be published in consultation with the clearinghouse advisory group.

(d) The board shall establish a clearinghouse advisory group consisting of educators, including classroom teachers, and representatives of organizations that represent educators to review and provide input regarding the best practices and industry recommendations included in the clearinghouse. In publishing the clearinghouse, the board shall ensure the clearinghouse reflects input provided by the clearinghouse advisory group.

(e) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the clearinghouse advisory group shall complete a review of the clearinghouse and submit a report to the legislature of the group's recommendations regarding whether any required continuing education or training may be reduced, eliminated, or consolidated with other existing continuing education or training.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 21.4515. ANNUAL ADOPTION OF PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT POLICY. (a) The board of trustees of a school district and the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school, to the extent applicable, shall annually review the clearinghouse published under Section 21.4514 and adopt a professional development policy that must:

(1) be guided by the recommendations for training in the clearinghouse;

(2) note any differences in the policy adopted by the district or school from the recommendations in the clearinghouse; and

(3) include a schedule of all training required for educators or other school personnel at the district or school.

(b) To the extent of any conflict, a frequency requirement for the completion of training provided by statute prevails over a frequency requirement for that training included in the policy adopted by the board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school under Subsection (a).

(c) The commissioner may not adopt rules regarding a required frequency for the completion of training unless:

(1) a frequency is provided by statute for that training; and

(2) the commissioner is granted explicit rulemaking authority related to that training.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 21.452. DEVELOPMENTAL LEAVES OF ABSENCE. (a) The board of trustees of a school district may grant a developmental leave of absence for study, research, travel, or another suitable purpose to an employee who:

(1) is employed in a position requiring a permanent teaching certificate; and

(2) has served in the same school district at least five consecutive school years.

(b) The board may grant a developmental leave of absence for one school year at one-half salary or for one-half of a school year at full salary paid to the employee in the same manner, on the same schedule, and with the same deductions as if the employee were on full-time duty.

(c) An employee on developmental leave continues to be a member of the Teacher Retirement System of Texas and is entitled to participate in programs, hold memberships, and receive benefits afforded by employment in the school district.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 21.453. STAFF DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT. (a) The staff development account is an account in the general revenue fund. The account consists of gifts, grants, donations, appropriations for the purpose of staff development under this subchapter, and any other money transferred by law to the account. Funds in the account may be used only as provided by this section.

(b) The commissioner may allocate funds from the account to regional education service centers to provide staff development resources to school districts that:

(1) are rated academically unacceptable;

(2) have one or more campuses rated as academically unacceptable; or

(3) are otherwise in need of assistance as indicated by the academic performance of students, as determined by the commissioner.

(c) A school district that receives resources under this section must pay to the commissioner for deposit in the account an amount equal to one-half of the cost of the resources provided to the district.

(d) The commissioner may adopt rules governing the allocation and use of funds under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 3.04, eff. May 31, 2006.

For expiration of this section, see Subsection (f).

Sec. 21.4552. TEACHER LITERACY ACHIEVEMENT ACADEMIES. (a) The commissioner shall develop and make available literacy achievement academies for teachers who provide reading instruction to students at any grade level.

(b) A literacy achievement academy developed under this section:

(1) for teachers who provide reading instruction to students at the kindergarten or first, second, or third grade level:

(A) must include training in:

(i) effective and systematic instructional practices in reading, including phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension; and

(ii) the use of empirically validated instructional methods that are appropriate for struggling readers; and

(B) may include training in effective instructional practices in writing;

(2) for teachers who provide reading instruction to students at the fourth or fifth grade level:

(A) must include effective instructional practices that promote student development of reading comprehension and inferential and critical thinking;

(B) must provide training in the use of empirically validated instructional methods that are appropriate for struggling readers; and

(C) may include material on writing instruction;

(3) for teachers who provide reading instruction to students at the sixth, seventh, or eighth grade level, must include training in:

(A) strategies to be implemented in English language arts and other subject areas for multisyllable word reading, vocabulary development, and comprehension of expository and narrative text;

(B) an adaptation framework that enables teachers to respond to differing student strengths and needs, including adaptations for students of limited English proficiency or students receiving special education services under Subchapter A, Chapter 29;

(C) collaborative strategies to increase active student involvement and motivation to read; and

(D) other areas identified by the commissioner as essential components of reading instruction;

(4) for teachers who provide reading instruction to students at the seventh or eighth grade level, must include training in:

(A) administration of the reading instrument required by Section 28.006(c-1); and

(B) interpretation of the results of the reading instrument required by Section 28.006(c-1) and strategies, based on scientific research regarding effective reading instruction, for long-term intensive intervention to target identified student needs in word recognition, vocabulary, fluency, and comprehension; and

(5) for teachers who provide instruction in mathematics, science, or social studies to students at the sixth, seventh, or eighth grade level, must include training in:

(A) strategies for incorporating reading instruction into the curriculum for the subject area taught by the teacher; and

(B) other areas identified by the commissioner.

(b-1) The completion of a literacy achievement academy under this section by an educator who teaches students with dyslexia satisfies:

(1) the training requirement under Section 21.054(b); and

(2) a training requirement adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 38.003 related to the screening or treatment of a student for dyslexia or a related disorder.

(c) The commissioner shall adopt criteria for selecting teachers who may attend a literacy achievement academy. In adopting selection criteria under this subsection, the commissioner shall:

(1) require a teacher to attend a literacy achievement academy if the teacher provides instruction in reading, mathematics, science, or social studies to students at the sixth, seventh, or eighth grade level at a campus that fails to satisfy any standard under Section 39.054(e) on the basis of student performance on the reading assessment instrument administered under Section 39.023(a) to students in any grade level at the campus;

(2) grant priority to teachers employed by a school district at a campus at which 50 percent or more of the students enrolled are educationally disadvantaged; and

(3) provide a process through which a teacher not employed at a campus described by Subdivision (2) may attend the academy if the academy has available space and the school district employing the teacher pays the costs of the teacher's attendance.

(d) From funds appropriated for that purpose, a teacher who attends a literacy achievement academy is entitled to receive a stipend in the amount determined by the commissioner. A stipend received under this subsection is not considered in determining whether a school district is paying the teacher the minimum monthly salary under Section 21.402.

(e) On request of the commissioner, regional education service centers shall assist the commissioner and agency with training and other activities relating to the development and operation of literacy achievement academies.

(f) This section expires September 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 55 (S.B. 925), Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 6, eff. June 18, 2021.

For expiration of this section, see Subsection (f).

Sec. 21.4553. TEACHER MATHEMATICS ACHIEVEMENT ACADEMIES. (a) The commissioner shall develop and make available mathematics achievement academies for teachers who provide mathematics instruction to students at any grade level.

(b) A mathematics achievement academy developed under this section must, if appropriate for the grade level at which the teacher provides instruction, include training in:

(1) effective and systematic instructional practices in mathematics, including problem solving, the place value system, whole number operations, and fractions;

(2) the underlying mathematical skills required to be taught; and

(3) mathematical instruction techniques that, through scientific testing, have been proven effective.

(c) The commissioner shall adopt criteria for selecting teachers who may attend a mathematics achievement academy. In adopting selection criteria under this subsection, the commissioner shall:

(1) require granting a priority to teachers employed by a school district at a campus at which 50 percent or more of the students enrolled are educationally disadvantaged; and

(2) provide a process through which a teacher not employed at a campus described by Subdivision (1) may attend the academy if the academy has available space and the school district employing the teacher pays the costs of the teacher's attendance.

(d) From funds appropriated for that purpose, a teacher who attends a mathematics achievement academy is entitled to receive a stipend in the amount determined by the commissioner. A stipend received under this subsection is not considered in determining whether a district is paying the teacher the minimum monthly salary under Section 21.402.

(e) On request of the commissioner, regional education service centers shall assist the commissioner and agency with training and other activities relating to the development and operation of mathematics achievement academies.

(f) This section expires September 1, 2027.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 202 (S.B. 934), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 7, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 21.4555. CIVICS TRAINING PROGRAM. (a) To facilitate the teaching of curriculum consistent with Sections 28.002(h-2) and 28.0022, the commissioner shall develop and make available civics training programs for teachers and administrators.

(b) A civics training program developed under this section must include training in:

(1) the essential knowledge and skills for the social studies curriculum related to civic knowledge adopted under Section 28.002(h-2);

(2) guided classroom discussion of current events, as appropriate for the grade level and consistent with the restrictions under Section 28.0022;

(3) classroom simulations and models of governmental and democratic processes consistent with the requirements and restrictions of Sections 28.002(h-2) and 28.0022;

(4) media literacy, including instruction on verifying information and sources, identifying and responding to logical fallacies, and identifying propaganda, as appropriate for the grade level and consistent with the restrictions under Section 28.0022; and

(5) strategies for incorporating civics instruction into subject areas other than social studies.

(c) The commissioner by rule shall establish the grade levels at which a teacher provides instruction to be eligible to participate in a civics training program. In making the determination, the commissioner shall include grade levels for which the State Board of Education makes significant revisions to the essential knowledge and skills for the social studies curriculum under Section 28.002(h-2).

(d) Each civics training program developed under Subsection (a) must be reviewed and approved by the State Board of Education. The board shall annually review each program.

(e) Each school district and open-enrollment charter school shall ensure that each district or school campus that offers a grade level described by Subsection (c) has at least one teacher and one principal or campus instructional leader who has attended a civics training program. The agency shall provide assistance to school districts and open-enrollment charter schools in complying with the requirements of this subsection.

(f) From funds available for that purpose, a teacher who attends a civics training program may receive a stipend in an amount determined by the commissioner. A stipend received under this section is not included in determining whether a district is paying the teacher the minimum monthly salary under Section 21.402.

(g) The commissioner may delay implementation of Subsection (e) to a school year not later than the 2025-2026 school year if the revision of the essential knowledge and skills for the social studies curriculum under Section 28.002(h-2) or the availability of civics training programs does not occur in a manner that reasonably affords public schools the ability to comply with that subsection by an earlier school year. This subsection expires September 1, 2026.

(h) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the teaching of or instruction in the essential knowledge and skills adopted under Subchapter A, Chapter 28.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 1, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 21.4556. CIVICS TRAINING PROGRAM ADVISORY BOARD. (a) The commissioner shall establish an advisory board to advise the commissioner in developing the civics training programs under Section 21.4555.

(b) The advisory board is composed of nine members appointed by the commissioner.

(c) Each member must be a current or former educator with at least 10 years of experience.

(d) Members are not entitled to reimbursement for travel or other expenses.

(e) The advisory board is not subject to Chapter 551 or 552, Government Code.

(f) Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the advisory board.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 1, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 21.456. SCIENCE TRAINING. (a) The commissioner shall develop and have approved by the board training materials and other teacher training resources for a school district to use in assisting science teachers in developing:

(1) expertise in the appropriate science curriculum; and

(2) comprehension of the instructional approaches that, through scientific testing, have been proven effective in improving student science skills.

(b) To the extent practicable, the training materials and other teacher training resources required under Subsection (a) shall address instructional approaches designed to reduce any identified disparities in student science performance between groups of students.

(c) The commissioner shall develop materials and resources under this section in consultation with appropriate faculty members at institutions of higher education.

(d) The commissioner shall make the training materials and other teacher training resources required under Subsection (a) available to science teachers through a variety of mechanisms, including distance learning, mentoring programs, small group inquiries, computer-assisted training, and mechanisms based on trainer-of-trainer models.

(e) The commissioner shall use funds appropriated for the purpose to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 430, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 21.457. TRAINING FOR TEACHERS OF EMERGENT BILINGUAL STUDENTS. The commissioner shall develop and make available training materials and other teacher training resources to assist teachers in developing the expertise required to enable emergent bilingual students to meet state performance expectations.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1212, Sec. 6, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 21.456 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(13), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 2066), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 21.4571. TEXAS ENGLISH LANGUAGE PROFICIENCY ASSESSMENT SYSTEM TRAINING. (a) The commissioner may not require a school district employee to repeat training or online calibration activities the employee has previously successfully completed related to administering the Texas English Language Proficiency Assessment System, except that the commissioner may require the employee to complete training or online calibration activities if the administration of or assessment using the Texas English Language Proficiency Assessment System has changed significantly since the employee completed the training.

(b) The school district employee assigned to oversee the administration of the Texas English Language Proficiency Assessment System at a district campus may, with discretion, require other district employees involved in administering the Texas English Language Proficiency Assessment System to complete training or online calibration activities described by Subsection (a).

(c) A school district employee may not be required to complete a training or online calibration activity described by Subsection (a) in one sitting.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 8, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 21.458. MENTORS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (a-2), each school district may assign a mentor teacher to each classroom teacher who has less than two years of teaching experience in the subject or grade level to which the teacher is assigned. A teacher assigned as a mentor must:

(1) to the extent practicable, teach in the same school;

(2) to the extent practicable, teach the same subject or grade level, as applicable; and

(3) meet the qualifications prescribed by commissioner rules adopted under Subsection (b).

(a-1) To be assigned as a mentor, a teacher must agree to serve as a mentor teacher for at least one school year. The assignment must begin not later than the 30th day of employment of the classroom teacher to whom the mentor teacher is assigned. A district must agree to assign a mentor to a new classroom teacher for at least two school years.

(a-2) A school district shall assign a mentor teacher to a classroom teacher who has been issued a temporary certificate to teach career and technology education under Section 21.0444 for at least two school years.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to administer this section, including rules concerning the duties and qualifications of a teacher who serves as a mentor and the number of classroom teachers that may be assigned to a mentor. The rules concerning qualifications must require that to serve as a mentor a teacher must:

(1) complete a research-based mentor and induction training program approved by the commissioner;

(2) complete a mentor training program provided by the district, which the district may allow to be satisfied by completing the training program described by Subdivision (1);

(3) have at least three complete years of teaching experience with a superior record of assisting students, as a whole, in achieving improvement in student performance; and

(4) demonstrate interpersonal skills, instructional effectiveness, and leadership skills.

(b-1) A school district must provide training as described by Subsection (b)(2) to mentor teachers and any appropriate district and campus employees who work with the classroom teacher or supervise the classroom teacher. A district may allow a training program approved by the commissioner under Subsection (b)(1) to qualify for the training required by this section. The training must be completed by the mentor teacher and the district and campus employees before the beginning of the school year. The district shall also provide supplemental training to mentor teachers and employees during the school year. The training must include content related to best mentorship practices.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4.001(a)(10), eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) In adopting rules under this section, the commissioner shall rely on research-based mentoring programs that, through external evaluation, have demonstrated success.

(e) Each year the commissioner shall report to the legislature regarding the effectiveness of school district mentoring programs.

(f) A mentor teacher must meet with each classroom teacher assigned to the mentor not less than 12 hours each semester. Observations of the mentor by the classroom teacher being mentored or of the classroom teacher being mentored by the mentor may count toward the 12 hours of meeting time required for the semester. Except as provided by Subsection (f-1), the mentoring sessions must address the following topics:

(1) orientation to the context, policies, and practices of the school district;

(2) data-driven instructional practices;

(3) specific instructional coaching cycles, including coaching regarding conferences between parents and the classroom teacher;

(4) professional development; and

(5) professional expectations.

(f-1) Subject to approval by the agency, in determining the topics to be addressed in the mentoring sessions, a school district may create an appropriate curriculum that meets the district needs.

(g) A school district must:

(1) designate a specific time during the regularly contracted school day for meetings between mentor teachers and classroom teachers assigned to a mentor; and

(2) schedule release time or a reduced teaching load for mentor teachers and classroom teachers under this section to facilitate mentoring activities, including classroom observations or participation in supportive coaching.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.07, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 796 (S.B. 1290), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1282 (H.B. 2012), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.009, eff. June 12, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4.001(a)(10), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 9, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 806 (H.B. 621), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 21.459. BIBLE COURSE TRAINING. (a) The commissioner shall develop and make available training materials and other teacher training resources for a school district to use in assisting teachers of elective Bible courses in developing:

(1) expertise in the appropriate Bible course curriculum;

(2) understanding of applicable supreme court rulings and current constitutional law regarding how Bible courses are to be taught in public schools objectively as a part of a secular program of education;

(3) understanding of how to present the Bible in an objective, academic manner that neither promotes nor disparages religion, nor is taught from a particular sectarian point of view;

(4) proficiency in instructional approaches that present course material in a manner that respects all faiths and religious traditions, while favoring none; and

(5) expertise in how to avoid devotional content or proselytizing in the classroom.

(b) The commissioner shall develop materials and resources under this section in consultation with appropriate faculty members at institutions of higher education.

(c) The commissioner shall make the training materials and other teacher training resources required under Subsection (a) available to Bible course teachers through access to in-service training.

(d) The commissioner shall use funds appropriated for the purpose to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (H.B. 1287), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 21.462. RESOURCES REGARDING STUDENTS WITH MENTAL HEALTH OR SUBSTANCE ABUSE CONDITIONS. The agency, in coordination with the Health and Human Services Commission, shall establish and maintain an Internet website to provide resources for school district or open-enrollment charter school employees regarding working with students with mental health conditions or who engage in substance abuse. The agency must include on the Internet website information about:

(1) grief-informed and trauma-informed practices;

(2) building skills related to managing emotions, establishing and maintaining positive relationships, and responsible decision-making;

(3) positive behavior interventions and supports; and

(4) a safe and supportive school climate.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (S.B. 179), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.06, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 21.464. PREKINDERGARTEN TEACHER TRAINING COURSE. (a) The commissioner shall develop a prekindergarten teacher training course to be offered to prekindergarten teachers employed by a school district or open-enrollment charter school.

(b) A course provided under this section shall provide instruction in the development and operation of effective prekindergarten classes, including training in:

(1) the prekindergarten guidelines established by the agency;

(2) effective and systematic instructional techniques for teaching prekindergarten students using the prekindergarten guidelines; and

(3) designing and implementing a comprehensive curriculum in the classroom.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 142 (H.B. 4), Sec. 8, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 21.465. AUTISM TRAINING. (a) A school district may provide a salary incentive or similar compensation to a teacher who completes training provided by a regional education service center relating to autism.

(b) A school district that decides to provide an incentive or compensation under Subsection (a) shall adopt a policy to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.010, eff. June 12, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER K. TEXAS TROOPS TO TEACHERS PROGRAM

Sec. 21.501. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "program" means the Texas Troops to Teachers Program.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.502. ESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM. The agency shall establish a program to:

(1) assist persons who have served in the armed forces of the United States and are separated from active duty to obtain certification as an elementary or secondary school teacher in this state; and

(2) facilitate the employment of those persons by school districts that have a shortage of teachers.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.503. ELIGIBILITY. A person is eligible for the program if the person:

(1) has served in the armed forces of the United States;

(2) is honorably discharged, retired, or released from active duty on or after October 1, 1990, after at least six years of continuous active duty service immediately before the discharge, retirement, or release;

(3) has received a baccalaureate or advanced degree from a public or private institution of higher education accredited by a regional accrediting agency or group that is recognized by a nationally recognized accreditation board; and

(4) satisfies any other criteria for selection jointly prescribed by the agency and the State Board for Educator Certification.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.504. INFORMATION AND APPLICATIONS. (a) The agency shall develop an application for the program.

(b) The agency and the State Board for Educator Certification shall distribute the applications and information regarding the program.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.505. SELECTION OF PARTICIPANTS. (a) The agency shall select persons to participate in the program on the basis of applications submitted to the agency.

(b) Each application must be submitted:

(1) in the form and contain the information the agency requires; and

(2) in a timely manner.

(c) An application is considered to be submitted in a timely manner for purposes of Subsection (b)(2) if the application is submitted:

(1) not later than October 5, 1999, in the case of an applicant discharged, retired, or released from active duty before January 19, 1999; or

(2) except as provided by Subdivision (1), not later than the first anniversary of the date of the applicant's discharge, retirement, or release from active duty.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.506. LIMITATION ON IMPLEMENTATION. The agency may not select a person to participate in the program unless the agency has sufficient state appropriations to pay the stipend provided by Section 21.509 at the time of the selection.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.507. PREFERENCES. (a) In selecting persons to participate in the program, the agency shall give preference to a person who:

(1) has significant educational or military experience in science, mathematics, or engineering and agrees to seek employment as a teacher in one of those subjects in a public elementary or secondary school in this state; or

(2) has significant educational or military experience in a field other than science, mathematics, or engineering identified by the agency as a field important for state educational objectives and agrees to seek employment as a teacher in a subject related to that field in a public elementary or secondary school in this state.

(b) The commissioner shall determine the level of experience considered significant for purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.508. AGREEMENT. A person selected to participate in the program must enter into a written agreement with the agency under which the person agrees to:

(1) obtain, within the period the agency by rule requires, certification as an elementary or secondary school teacher in this state; and

(2) accept, during the first school year that begins after the date the person becomes certified, an offer of full-time employment as an elementary or secondary school teacher with a school district in this state.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.509. STIPEND. The agency shall pay to each participant in the program a stipend of $5,000.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.510. REIMBURSEMENT. (a) A participant in the program who fails to obtain certification or employment as required in the agreement under Section 21.508 or who voluntarily leaves or is terminated for cause from the employment after teaching in a public elementary or secondary school in this state for less than five school years shall reimburse the agency for the portion of the stipend that bears the same ratio to the amount of the stipend as the unserved portion of required service bears to the five years of required service.

(b) The obligation to reimburse the agency under this section is, for all purposes, a debt to the state. A discharge in bankruptcy under Title 11, United States Code, does not release a participant from the obligation to reimburse the agency. The amount owed bears interest at the rate equal to the highest rate being paid by the United States on the day the reimbursement is determined to be due for securities that have maturities of 90 days or less, and the interest accrues from the day the participant receives notice of the amount due.

(c) For purposes of this section, a participant in the program is not considered to be in violation of an agreement under Section 21.508 during any period in which the participant:

(1) is pursuing a full-time course of study related to the field of teaching at a public or private institution of higher education approved by the State Board for Educator Certification;

(2) is serving on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States;

(3) is temporarily totally disabled for a period not to exceed three years as established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician;

(4) is unable to secure employment for a period not to exceed one year because of care required by a disabled spouse;

(5) is seeking and unable to find full-time employment as a teacher in a public elementary or secondary school for a single period not to exceed 27 months; or

(6) satisfies the provisions of any additional reimbursement exception adopted by the agency.

(d) A participant is excused from reimbursement under Subsection (a) if:

(1) the participant becomes permanently totally disabled as established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; or

(2) the agency waives reimbursement in the case of extreme hardship to the participant.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 21.511. RULES. The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 7.001, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER L. TEACH FOR TEXAS PILOT PROGRAM RELATING TO ALTERNATIVE CERTIFICATION

Sec. 21.551. PURPOSES. The purposes of the alternative certification Teach for Texas Pilot Program are to:

(1) attract to the teaching profession persons who have expressed interest in teaching and to support the certification of those persons as teachers;

(2) recognize the importance of the certification process governed by the State Board for Educator Certification under Subchapter B, which requires verification of competence in subject area and professional knowledge and skills;

(3) encourage the creation and expansion of educator preparation programs that recognize the knowledge and skills gained through previous educational and work-related experiences and that are delivered in a manner that recognizes individual circumstances, including the need to remain employed full-time while enrolled in the Teach for Texas Pilot Program; and

(4) provide annual stipends to postbaccalaureate teacher certification candidates.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1590, Sec. 8, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 21.501 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(16), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.552. PROGRAM ESTABLISHED. The State Board for Educator Certification by rule shall establish the Teach for Texas Pilot Program consistent with the purposes provided by Section 21.551.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1590, Sec. 8, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 21.502 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(16), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.002(4), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.553. FINANCIAL INCENTIVES. (a) The pilot program must offer to participants financial incentives, including tuition assistance and loan forgiveness. In offering a financial incentive, the State Board for Educator Certification shall:

(1) require a contract between each participant who accepts a financial incentive and the State Board for Educator Certification under which the participant is obligated to teach in a public school in this state for a stated period after certification;

(2) provide financial incentives in proportion to the length of the period the participant is obligated by contract to teach after certification; and

(3) give special financial incentives to a participant who agrees in the contract to teach in an underserved area.

(b) Financial incentives may be paid only from funds appropriated specifically for that purpose and from gifts, grants, and donations solicited or accepted by the State Board for Educator Certification for that purpose.

(c) The State Board for Educator Certification shall propose rules establishing criteria for awarding financial incentives under this section, including criteria for awarding financial incentives if there are more participants than funds available to provide the financial incentives.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1590, Sec. 8, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 21.503 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(16), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER M. CAREERS TO CLASSROOMS PROGRAM

Sec. 21.601. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by 20 U.S.C. Section 1001 and its subsequent amendments.

(2) "Program" means the Careers to Classrooms Program.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.602. ESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM. The agency shall establish a program to:

(1) assist persons in obtaining certification in this state as elementary or secondary school teachers or educational aides; and

(2) facilitate the employment of those persons by school districts in this state that:

(A) receive grants under 20 U.S.C. Section 6311 et seq. and its subsequent amendments on the basis of having in the district concentrations of children who are educationally disadvantaged; and

(B) have a shortage of:

(i) qualified teachers, particularly science, mathematics, computer science, or engineering teachers; or

(ii) educational aides.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.603. ELIGIBILITY. A person is eligible for the program if:

(1) in the case of a person planning to become certified in this state as a public elementary or secondary school teacher, the person has received a baccalaureate or advanced degree from an institution of higher education; and

(2) in the case of a person planning to become certified in this state as an educational aide, the person has received an associate, baccalaureate, or advanced degree from an institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.604. INFORMATION AND APPLICATIONS. (a) The agency shall develop an application for the program.

(b) The agency and the State Board for Educator Certification shall distribute the applications and information regarding the program.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.605. SELECTION OF PARTICIPANTS. (a) The agency shall select persons to participate in the program on the basis of applications submitted to the agency.

(b) Each application must be submitted:

(1) in the form and contain the information the agency requires; and

(2) in a timely manner.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.606. PREFERENCES. (a) In selecting persons to participate in the program who are planning to become certified in this state as teachers, the agency shall give preference to a person who:

(1) has substantial, demonstrated career experience in science, mathematics, computer science, or engineering and agrees to seek employment as a teacher in one of those subjects in a public elementary or secondary school in this state; or

(2) has substantial, demonstrated career experience in a field other than science, mathematics, computer science, or engineering that is identified by the agency as a field important for state educational objectives and agrees to seek employment as a teacher in a subject related to that field in a public elementary or secondary school in this state.

(b) The commissioner shall determine the level of experience considered substantial for purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.607. AGREEMENT. (a) A person selected to participate in the program who is planning to become certified as a teacher must enter into a written agreement with the agency under which the person agrees to:

(1) obtain, within the period the agency by rule requires, certification in this state as an elementary or secondary school teacher; and

(2) accept, during the first school year that begins after the date the person becomes certified, an offer of full-time employment for at least two school years as an elementary or secondary school teacher with a school district described by Sections 21.602(2)(A) and (B)(i).

(b) A person selected to participate in the program who is planning to become certified as an educational aide must enter into a written agreement with the agency under which the person agrees to:

(1) obtain, within the period the agency by rule requires, certification in this state as an educational aide; and

(2) accept, during the first school year that begins after the date the person becomes certified, an offer of full-time employment for at least two school years as an educational aide with a school district described by Sections 21.602(2)(A) and (B)(ii).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.608. STIPEND. The agency shall pay to each participant in the program a stipend equal to the lesser of:

(1) $5,000; or

(2) an amount equal to the total costs of the type described by Paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (8), and (9), 20 U.S.C. Section 1087ll, and its subsequent amendments, incurred by the person while obtaining certification in this state as a teacher or educational aide and employment as a teacher or educational aide at a public elementary or secondary school in this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.609. REIMBURSEMENT. (a) A participant in the program who fails to obtain certification or employment as required by the agreement under Section 21.607 or who voluntarily leaves or is terminated for cause from employment after teaching in a public elementary or secondary school in this state for less than two school years shall reimburse the agency for the portion of the stipend that bears the same ratio to the amount of the stipend as the unserved portion of required service bears to the two school years of required service.

(b) The obligation to reimburse the agency under this section is, for all purposes, a debt to the state. A discharge in bankruptcy under Title 11, United States Code, does not release a participant from the obligation to reimburse the agency. The amount owed bears interest at the rate equal to the highest rate being paid by the United States on the day the reimbursement is determined to be due for securities that have maturities of 90 days or less, and the interest accrues from the day the participant receives notice of the amount due.

(c) For purposes of this section, a participant in the program is not considered to be in violation of an agreement under Section 21.607 during any period in which the participant:

(1) is pursuing a full-time course of study related to the field of teaching at an institution of higher education approved by the State Board for Educator Certification;

(2) is serving on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States;

(3) is temporarily totally disabled for a period not to exceed three years as established by affidavit of a qualified physician;

(4) is unable to secure employment for a period not to exceed one year because of care required by a disabled spouse;

(5) is seeking and unable to find full-time employment as a teacher in a public elementary or secondary school for a single period not to exceed 27 months; or

(6) satisfies the provisions of any additional reimbursement exception adopted by the agency.

(d) A participant is excused from reimbursement under Subsection (a) if the participant becomes permanently totally disabled as established by affidavit of a qualified physician. The agency may waive reimbursement for some or all of the amount owed in the case of extreme hardship to the participant.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.610. GRANTS TO FACILITATE PLACEMENT. (a) The agency may enter into an agreement as prescribed by Subsection (b) with a school district described by Section 21.602(2) that first employs as a full-time elementary or secondary school teacher or educational aide after certification a person participating in the program.

(b) An agreement under this section must provide that:

(1) the school district agrees to employ the person full-time for at least two school years at a specified salary in a district school that:

(A) serves a concentration of children who are educationally disadvantaged; and

(B) has an exceptional need for teachers or educational aides, as applicable; and

(2) the state shall pay the district for that person $5,000 each year for not more than two years.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 21.611. RULES. The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 808, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER O. EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE INNOVATION PROGRAM

Sec. 21.701. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "program" means the educator excellence innovation program.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.08, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.7011. PURPOSES. The purposes of the educator excellence innovation program are to:

(1) systemically transform:

(A) educator quality and effectiveness through improved and innovative school district-level recruitment, preparation, hiring, induction, evaluation, professional development, strategic compensation, career pathways, and retention; and

(B) district administrative practices to improve quality, effectiveness, and efficiency; and

(2) use the enhanced educator and administrative quality and effectiveness to improve student learning and student academic performance, especially the learning and academic performance of students enrolled in districts that:

(A) receive federal funding under Title I of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Section 6301 et seq.); and

(B) have at a majority of district campuses a student enrollment of which at least 50 percent is educationally disadvantaged.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.702. EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE INNOVATION PROGRAM. (a) The commissioner by rule shall establish the program under which school districts, in accordance with local educator excellence innovation plans approved by the commissioner, receive competitive program grants from the agency for carrying out the purposes of the program as described by Section 21.7011.

(b) In establishing the program, the commissioner shall adopt program guidelines in accordance with this subchapter for a school district to follow in developing a local educator excellence innovation plan under Section 21.704.

(c) In adopting rules under this section, the commissioner shall include rules governing eligibility for and participation by an open-enrollment charter school in the program.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.08, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.703. AMOUNT OF GRANT AWARD. (a) Each state fiscal year, the agency shall provide each school district approved on a competitive basis under this subchapter with a grant in an amount determined by the agency in accordance with commissioner rule.

(b) Not later than April 1 of each state fiscal year, the agency shall provide written notice to each school district that will be provided a grant under this section that the district will be provided the grant and the amount of that grant.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.08, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 448 (H.B. 7), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.704. LOCAL EDUCATOR EXCELLENCE INNOVATION PLANS. (a) In a school district that intends to participate in the program, the district-level planning and decision-making committee established under Subchapter F, Chapter 11, shall develop a local educator excellence innovation plan for the district. The local educator excellence innovation plan may provide for all campuses in the district to participate in the program or only certain campuses selected by the district-level committee.

(c) A school district must submit a local educator excellence innovation plan to the agency for approval.

(c-1) A local educator excellence innovation plan must be designed to carry out each purpose of the program as described by Section 21.7011.

(d) The agency may approve only a local educator excellence innovation plan that meets program guidelines adopted by the commissioner under Section 21.702 and that satisfies this section and Section 21.706. From among the local educator excellence innovation plans submitted and depending on the amount of money available for distribution in the educator excellence innovation fund, the agency shall approve plans that most comprehensively and innovatively address the purposes of the program as described by Section 21.7011 so that the effectiveness of various plans in achieving those purposes can be compared and evaluated.

(e) A school district whose local educator excellence innovation plan is approved by the agency to receive a program grant under this subchapter may renew the plan for three consecutive school years without resubmitting the plan to the agency for approval. A school district may amend a local educator excellence innovation plan for approval by the agency for each school year the district receives a program grant.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.08, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 105(a)(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.706. INNOVATION PLAN PAYMENTS; AUTHORIZED GENERAL AND SPECIFIC USES. A school district may use grant funds awarded to the district under this subchapter only to carry out purposes of the program as described by Section 21.7011, in accordance with the district's local educator excellence innovation plan, which may include the following specific methods or procedures:

(1) implementation and administration of a high-quality mentoring program for teachers in a teacher's first three years of classroom teaching using mentors who meet the qualifications prescribed by Section 21.458(b);

(2) implementation of a teacher evaluation system using multiple measures that include:

(A) the results of classroom observation, which may include student comments;

(B) the degree of student educational growth and learning; and

(C) the results of teacher self-evaluation;

(3) to the extent permitted under Subchapter C, Chapter 25, restructuring of the school day or school year to provide for embedded and collaborative learning communities for the purpose of professional development;

(4) establishment of an alternative teacher compensation or retention system; and

(5) implementation of incentives designed to reduce teacher turnover.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.7061. IMPLEMENTATION FLEXIBILITY. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code and subject to Subsection (b), a school district may apply to the commissioner in writing in accordance with commissioner rule for a waiver to exempt the district or one or more district campuses from Section 21.352(a)(2)(B), 21.353, 21.354(d), 21.3541(g), 21.451, or 21.458, as specified in the waiver application. The district's application for a waiver under this section must demonstrate that the waiver is necessary to carry out purposes of the program as described by Section 21.7011, in accordance with the district's local educator excellence innovation plan.

(b) Before an application for a waiver is submitted to the commissioner under Subsection (a), the application specifying the provision for which the waiver is sought must be approved by a vote of:

(1) a majority of the members of the school district board of trustees; and

(2) a majority of the educators employed at each campus for which the waiver is sought.

(b-1) Voting for purposes of Subsection (b) must be conducted:

(1) in accordance with commissioner rule;

(2) during the school year; and

(3) in a manner that ensures that all educators entitled to vote have a reasonable opportunity to participate in the voting.

(c) The commissioner shall grant or deny an application under this section based on standards adopted by commissioner rule. The commissioner shall notify in writing each district that applies for a waiver under this section whether the application has been granted or denied not later than April 1 of the year in which the application is submitted.

(d) Neither the board of trustees of a school district nor the district superintendent may compel a waiver of rights under this section.

(e) A waiver granted under this section expires when the waiver is no longer necessary to carry out the purposes of the program as described by Section 21.7011, in accordance with the district's local educator excellence innovation plan.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (H.B. 1751), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 21.707. RULES. The commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to administer this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.08, eff. May 31, 2006.

SUBCHAPTER Q. TEXAS TEACHER RESIDENCY PROGRAM

Sec. 21.801. ESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM. (a) Not later than March 1, 2014, the commissioner of higher education shall, through a competitive selection process, establish a Texas Teacher Residency Program at a public institution of higher education that has developed a commitment to investing in teacher education.

(b) The public institution of higher education shall form a partnership with an area school district or open-enrollment charter school to provide employment to residents in the program.

(c) The program must be designed to:

(1) award teaching residents participating in the program a master's degree; and

(2) lead to certification under Subchapter B for participating teaching residents who are not already certified teachers.

(d) The public institution of higher education shall:

(1) reward faculty instructing in the teacher residency program;

(2) identify faculty who can prepare teachers to impact student achievement in high-need schools;

(3) provide institutional support of faculty who work with the teacher residency program by providing time to teach the courses and valuing the faculty's contributions with rewards in the university tenure process; and

(4) develop and implement a program that acknowledges and elevates the significance and professional nature of teaching at the primary and secondary levels.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1752), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 21.802. PROGRAM COMPONENTS. The teacher residency program shall include:

(1) competitive admission requirements with multiple criteria;

(2) integration of pedagogy and classroom practice;

(3) rigorous master's level course work, while undertaking a guided apprenticeship at the partner area school district or open-enrollment charter school;

(4) a team mentorship approach to expose teaching residents to a variety of teaching methods, philosophies, and classroom environments;

(5) clear criteria for the selection of mentor teachers based on measures of teacher effectiveness and the appropriate subject area knowledge;

(6) measures of appropriate progress through the program;

(7) the collaboration with one or more regional education service centers or local nonprofit education organizations to provide professional development or other structured learning experiences for teaching residents;

(8) a livable stipend for teaching residents;

(9) a post-completion commitment by teaching residents to serve four years at schools that are difficult to staff;

(10) job placement assistance for teaching residents;

(11) support for teaching residents for not less than one year following the resident's completion of the program through the provision of mentoring, professional development, and networking opportunities;

(12) demonstration of the integral role and responsibilities of the partner area school district or open-enrollment charter school in fulfilling the purpose of the program; and

(13) monetary or in-kind contributions provided by the public institution of higher education, partner area school district, or open-enrollment charter school to demonstrate that the program may be sustained in the absence of grant funds or state appropriations.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1752), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 21.803. PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY. To be eligible to be admitted and hired as a teaching resident under the program, an individual must:

(1) have received the individual's initial teaching certificate not more than two years before applying for a residency and must have less than 18 months of full-time equivalency teaching experience as a certified teacher; or

(2) hold a bachelor's degree and:

(A) be a mid-career professional from outside the field of education, and have strong content knowledge or a record of achievement; or

(B) be a noncertified educator such as a substitute teacher or teaching assistant.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1752), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 21.804. SELECTION OF PARTICIPANTS. The teaching residency program shall establish criteria for selection of individuals to participate in the program. The selection criteria must include:

(1) a demonstration of comprehensive subject area knowledge or a record of accomplishment in the field or subject area to be taught;

(2) strong verbal and written communication skills, which may be demonstrated by performance on appropriate tests; and

(3) attributes linked to effective teaching, which may be determined by interviews or performance assessments.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1752), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 21.805. RULES. The commissioner of higher education shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1752), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 21.806. AUTHORITY TO ACCEPT CERTAIN FUNDS. (a) The commissioner of higher education may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations from public and private entities to use for the purposes of this subchapter.

(b) The teacher residency program may be established and maintained only if sufficient funds are available under this section for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1752), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.